South Dakota, session 2026, HB1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the following moneys and
expenditure authority for the ordinary expenses of the legislative, judicial, and executive
departments of the state, the current expenses of state institutions, interest on the public debt, and
for common schools.
Section 2. The amounts appropriated in this Act are approved at the total level for each budget unit.
A line item increase or decrease shown within a budget unit is a change to the base. An agency may
expend base moneys to supplement line item changes. Unless otherwise provided, conditions, terms,
and other requirements on appropriations in this Act are effective until June 30, 2027.
Section 3.
(010) OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
(0101) Office of the Governor
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,030,238 - - $3,030,238 21.5
Appropriation $3,030,238 - - $3,030,238 21.5
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Office of the Governor.
(0102) Governor's Contingency Fund
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $75,000 - - $75,000 -
Appropriation $75,000 - - $75,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Governor's Contingency Fund.
(01051) Governor's Office of Economic Development
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,523,560 $29,080,049 $40,425,898 $74,029,507 41.6

26.1062.14 2 1326
Infrastructure Investment and - ($20,000,000) - ($20,000,000) -
Jobs Act Broadband Grants
Accounting Services for State - $23,000 - $23,000 -
Small Business Credit
Initiative
State Audit Services - - $23,786 $23,786 -
Accounting Services for - - $14,000 $14,000 -
Revolving Economic
Development Initiative Fund
Appropriation $4,523,560 $9,103,049 $40,463,684 $54,090,293 41.6
($20,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for eliminating authority related to expiring Infrastructure Investment
and Jobs Act grants.
$23,000 in federal fund expenditure authority for State Small Business Credit Initiative independent accounting services.
$23,786 in other fund expenditure authority for revolving economic development and initiative fund state audit services.
$14,000 in other fund expenditure authority for revolving economic development and initiative fund independent
accounting services.
(01053) SD Housing Development Authority - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $3,157,892 $19,149,549 $22,307,441 76.0
Appropriation - $3,157,892 $19,149,549 $22,307,441 76.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit SD Housing Development Authority - Informational.
(01054) SD Science and Tech Authority - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,367,545 $2,367,545 6.7
Appropriation - - $2,367,545 $2,367,545 6.7
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit SD Science and Tech Authority - Informational.
(01056) Ellsworth Authority - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $847,475 $847,475 -
Appropriation - - $847,475 $847,475 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Ellsworth Authority - Informational.
(010571) REDI Grants
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,626,608 $1,626,608 -
Appropriation - - $1,626,608 $1,626,608 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit REDI Grants.
(010572) Local Infrastructure Improvement
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,470,000 - $1,470,000 $2,940,000 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 3 1326
Appropriation $1,470,000 - $1,470,000 $2,940,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Local Infrastructure Improvement.
(010573) Economic Development Partnership
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $50,000 $50,000 -
Appropriation - - $50,000 $50,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Economic Development Partnership.
(010574) SD Housing Opportunity
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,040,000 - $3,040,000 $4,080,000 -
Appropriation $1,040,000 - $3,040,000 $4,080,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit SD Housing Opportunity.
(010575) Workforce Education
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $490,000 - - $490,000 -
Appropriation $490,000 - - $490,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Workforce Education.
(0108) Lt. Governor
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $43,122 - - $43,122 0.5
Appropriation $43,122 - - $43,122 0.5
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Lt. Governor.
(010) OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $10,671,920 $32,237,941 $68,977,075 $111,886,936 146.3
Adjustments - ($19,977,000) $37,786 ($19,939,214) -
Appropriation $10,671,920 $12,260,941 $69,014,861 $91,947,722 146.3
Personal Services $5,622,077 $2,729,357 $7,710,907 $16,062,341
Operating Expenses $5,049,843 $9,531,584 $61,303,954 $75,885,381
Total $10,671,920 $12,260,941 $69,014,861 $91,947,722 146.3
Section 4.
(011) BUREAU OF FINANCE AND MANAGEMENT (BFM)
(0111) Bureau of Finance and Management
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,373,089 - $9,743,824 $11,116,913 48.0
Accountant III - - $118,284 $118,284 1.0
Appropriation $1,373,089 - $9,862,108 $11,235,197 49.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 4 1326
$118,284 in other fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for a new accountant position.
(0113) Computer Services and Development
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,000,000 $2,000,000 -
Appropriation - - $2,000,000 $2,000,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Computer Services and Development.
(0115) Building Authority - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,339,433 $1,339,433 -
Appropriation - - $1,339,433 $1,339,433 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Building Authority - Informational.
(0116) Health and Education Facilities Authority - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $994,495 $994,495 5.0
Appropriation - - $994,495 $994,495 5.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Health and Education Facilities Authority - Informational.
(0117) Employee Compensation and Billing Pools
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - - - -
Bureau Billing Adjustments $332,195 $262,415 $709,194 $1,303,804 -
State Salary Policy at 1.4% $7,890,576 $3,289,350 $8,099,898 $19,279,824 -
Appropriation $8,222,771 $3,551,765 $8,809,092 $20,583,628 -
$332,195 in general funds, $262,415 in federal fund expenditure authority and $709,194 in other fund expenditure
authority for pool bureau billing adjustments.
$7,890,576 in general funds, $3,289,350 in federal fund expenditure authority and $8,099,898 in other fund expenditure
authority for state employee compensation inflation of 1.4%.
(0119) Educational Enhancement Funding Corporation - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $140,314 $140,314 -
Appropriation - - $140,314 $140,314 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Educational Enhancement Funding Corporation - Informational.
(011) BUREAU OF FINANCE AND MANAGEMENT (BFM) TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,373,089 - $14,218,066 $15,591,155 53.0
Adjustments $8,222,771 $3,551,765 $8,927,376 $20,701,912 1.0
Appropriation $9,595,860 $3,551,765 $23,145,442 $36,293,067 54.0
Personal Services $8,713,054 $3,118,984 $13,020,258 $24,852,296
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 5 1326
Operating Expenses $882,806 $432,781 $10,125,184 $11,440,771
Total $9,595,860 $3,551,765 $23,145,442 $36,293,067 54.0
Section 5.
(012) BUREAU OF HUMAN RESOURCES AND ADMINISTRATION (BHRA)
(0121) Administrative Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $683 - $528,458 $529,141 2.3
Appropriation $683 - $528,458 $529,141 2.3
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Administrative Services.
(0123) General Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $489,144 - $29,577,306 $30,066,450 131.5
Internal Legal Services - - $282,602 $282,602 -
Utility Cost Adjustment - - $154,545 $154,545 -
Security and Permissions - - - - -
Budget Transfer
Appropriation $489,144 - $30,014,453 $30,503,597 131.5
$282,602 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
$154,545 in other fund expenditure authority for adjustments in utility expenses.
$102,156 in other fund expenditure authority and ($102,156) in other fund expenditure authority, totaling a change of
$0, for transferring physical security duties from the Bureau of Information and Technology.
(0124) State Engineer
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,095,840 $2,095,840 16.0
Internal Legal Services - - $34,916 $34,916 -
Appropriation - - $2,130,756 $2,130,756 16.0
$34,916 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
(0125) Statewide Maintenance and Repair
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $13,498,276 $500,000 $3,839,246 $17,837,522 -
Maintenance and Repair $316,722 - - $316,722 -
Appropriation $13,814,998 $500,000 $3,839,246 $18,154,244 -
$316,722 in general funds for maintenance and repair at 1.25% of replacement value.
(0126) Office of Hearing Examiners
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $495,900 - - $495,900 3.0
Internal Legal Services $6,547 - - $6,547 -
Appropriation $502,447 - - $502,447 3.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 6 1326
$6,547 in general funds for legal services billings.
(0127) Obligation Recovery Center
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,240,000 $1,240,000 -
Appropriation - - $1,240,000 $1,240,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Obligation Recovery Center.
(01281) Risk Management Administration - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $11,055,639 $11,055,639 13.0
Internal Legal Services - - $17,459 $17,459 -
Appropriation - - $11,073,098 $11,073,098 13.0
$17,459 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
(01282) Risk Management Claims - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $6,727,456 $6,727,456 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($2,000,000) ($2,000,000) -
Appropriation - - $4,727,456 $4,727,456 -
($2,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(01291) Personnel Management/Employee Benefits
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $387,385 - $10,067,956 $10,455,341 71.2
Internal Legal Services - - $374,351 $374,351 -
Appropriation $387,385 - $10,442,307 $10,829,692 71.2
$374,351 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
(012) BUREAU OF HUMAN RESOURCES AND ADMINISTRATION (BHRA) TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $14,871,388 $500,000 $66,967,901 $82,339,289 237.0
Adjustments $323,269 - ($2,972,127) ($2,648,858) -
Appropriation $15,194,657 $500,000 $63,995,774 $79,690,431 237.0
Personal Services $982,505 $0 $19,753,406 $20,735,911
Operating Expenses $14,212,152 $500,000 $44,242,368 $58,954,520
Total $15,194,657 $500,000 $63,995,774 $79,690,431 237.0
Section 6.
(013) BUREAU OF INFORMATION AND TECHNOLOGY (BIT)
(0131) Enterprise Platforms and Infrastructure
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $16,434,097 $16,434,097 65.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 7 1326
Internal Legal Services - - $2,632 $2,632 -
Software Suite Support - - $33,551 $33,551 -
Contract
Geographic Information - - $97,500 $97,500 -
Systems Software Contract
Inflation
Other Operational and Security - - $298,468 $298,468 -
Software Contracts
Development Billings - - $936,855 $936,855 -
Cloud-Based Systems - - $520,000 $520,000 -
Enterprise Hosting Budget - - $121,244 $121,244 1.0
Transfer
Appropriation - - $18,444,347 $18,444,347 66.0
$2,632 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
$33,551 in other fund expenditure authority for a new support contract for office software.
$97,500 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of existing enterprise-level mapping software.
$298,468 in other fund expenditure authority for new and increased licensing and subscription costs, cybersecurity
enhancement costs, and video management system costs.
$936,855 in other fund expenditure authority for increased billable hours of development work.
$520,000 in other fund expenditure authority for an increase in the use of cloud-based systems.
$121,244 in other fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for transferring a position to hire a cloud security
infrastructure engineer.
(0132) Agency and Application Support
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $18,115,191 $18,115,191 136.0
Enterprise Hosting Budget - - ($121,244) ($121,244) (1.0)
Transfer
Internal Legal Services - - $228,974 $228,974 -
Appropriation - - $18,222,921 $18,222,921 135.0
($121,244) in other fund expenditure authority and (1.0) in FTE for transferring a position to hire a cloud security
infrastructure engineer.
$228,974 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
(0133) Technology Operations and Communications
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $32,222,272 $32,222,272 100.0
Internal Legal Services - - $14,475 $14,475 -
Security and Permissions - - ($224,311) ($224,311) (2.0)
Budget Transfer
Office Software Suite Contract - - $356,756 $356,756 -
Inflation
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 8 1326
State IT Applications Contract - - $139,505 $139,505 -
Inflation
Development Billings - - $85,020 $85,020 -
Appropriation - - $32,593,717 $32,593,717 98.0
$14,475 in other fund expenditure authority for legal services billings.
($224,311) in other fund expenditure authority and (2.0) in FTE for transferring physical security duties to the Bureau of
Human Resources and Administration.
$356,756 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of licenses for a suite of office software.
$139,505 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of the platform supporting state IT applications.
$85,020 in other fund expenditure authority for increased billable hours of development work.
(0134) South Dakota Public Broadcasting
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $5,655,733 $272,484 $4,581,702 $10,509,919 63.5
Internal Legal Services $3,948 - - $3,948 -
South Dakota Public $296,053 - ($296,053) - -
Broadcasting Fund Swap
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($272,484) - ($272,484) -
Appropriation $5,955,734 - $4,285,649 $10,241,383 63.5
$3,948 in general funds for legal services billings.
$296,053 in general funds and ($296,053) in other fund expenditure authority for the replacement of federal funding
previously received from the Corporation for Public Broadcasting.
($272,484) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(0135) BIT Administration
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $6,619,457 $6,619,457 15.0
Appropriation - - $6,619,457 $6,619,457 15.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit BIT Administration.
(0136) State Radio Engineering
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,895,328 $99,804 $164,055 $5,159,187 11.0
Internal Legal Services $13,159 - - $13,159 -
State Radio Resiliency Package $260,000 - - $260,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($99,804) - ($99,804) -
Appropriation $5,168,487 - $164,055 $5,332,542 11.0
$13,159 in general funds for legal services billings.
$260,000 in general funds for a failover solution for State Radio.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 9 1326
($99,804) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(013) BUREAU OF INFORMATION AND TECHNOLOGY (BIT) TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $10,551,061 $372,288 $78,136,774 $89,060,123 390.5
Adjustments $573,160 ($372,288) $2,193,372 $2,394,244 (2.0)
Appropriation $11,124,221 - $80,330,146 $91,454,367 388.5
Personal Services $5,537,413 $0 $37,860,335 $43,397,748
Operating Expenses $5,586,808 $0 $42,469,811 $48,056,619
Total $11,124,221 $0 $80,330,146 $91,454,367 388.5
Section 7.
(02) DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(0210) Administration, Secretary of Revenue
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $5,658,266 $5,658,266 30.0
Appropriation - - $5,658,266 $5,658,266 30.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Administration, Secretary of Revenue.
(0220) Business Tax
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $7,653,850 $7,653,850 69.5
Property Tax Software - - $17,500 $17,500 -
Nicotine Product Regulation - - $490,000 $490,000 4.0
Positions
Appropriation - - $8,161,350 $8,161,350 73.5
$17,500 in other fund expenditure authority for existing property tax software.
$490,000 in other fund expenditure authority and 4.0 in FTE for new nicotine product regulation positions.
(0230) Motor Vehicles
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $397,295 $12,991,922 $13,389,217 48.0
Additional Self-Service Kiosks - - $36,000 $36,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($1,000,000) ($1,000,000) -
Appropriation - $397,295 $12,027,922 $12,425,217 48.0
$36,000 in other fund expenditure authority for the annual maintenance costs of two new self-service motor vehicle
kiosks.
($1,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(0240) Property Taxes
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,154,380 - - $1,154,380 9.0
Property Tax Software $66,500 - - $66,500 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 10 1326
Appropriation $1,220,880 - - $1,220,880 9.0
$66,500 in general funds for existing property tax software.
(0250) Audits
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $6,422,590 $6,422,590 55.0
Sales and Use Tax Auditor - - $85,050 $85,050 1.0
Appropriation - - $6,507,640 $6,507,640 56.0
$85,050 in other fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for a new sales and use tax auditor position.
(0281) Instant and On-line Operations - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $63,187,572 $63,187,572 21.0
Appropriation - - $63,187,572 $63,187,572 21.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Instant and On-line Operations - Informational.
(0282) Video Lottery
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $3,019,850 $3,019,850 10.0
Appropriation - - $3,019,850 $3,019,850 10.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Video Lottery.
(0293) Commission on Gaming - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $11,351,150 $11,351,150 16.0
Appropriation - - $11,351,150 $11,351,150 16.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Commission on Gaming - Informational.
(02) DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,154,380 $397,295 $110,285,200 $111,836,875 258.5
Adjustments $66,500 - ($371,450) ($304,950) 5.0
Appropriation $1,220,880 $397,295 $109,913,750 $111,531,925 263.5
Personal Services $875,736 $0 $23,883,297 $24,759,033
Operating Expenses $345,144 $397,295 $86,030,453 $86,772,892
Total $1,220,880 $397,295 $109,913,750 $111,531,925 263.5
Section 8.
(03) DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL RESOURCES
(030) Administration, Secretary of Agriculture
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,962,497 $1,751,086 $806,484 $4,520,067 18.0
Appropriation $1,962,497 $1,751,086 $806,484 $4,520,067 18.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 11 1326
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Administration, Secretary of Agriculture.
(031) Agricultural and Environmental Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,119,496 $7,607,183 $5,534,254 $17,260,933 94.9
Concentrated Animal Feeding ($71,000) - $171,000 $100,000 -
Operations
Office of Water Budget Transfer - - ($550,000) ($550,000) -
Agriculture & Environmental - - $250,000 $250,000 -
Services Budget Transfer
State Hemp Program ($350,000) - ($38,000) ($388,000) (3.0)
Elimination
Program Cost Increases $150,000 - - $150,000 -
Appropriation $3,848,496 $7,607,183 $5,367,254 $16,822,933 91.9
($71,000) in general funds and $171,000 in other fund expenditure authority for existing Concentrated Animal Feeding
Operation costs.
($550,000) in other fund expenditure authority for transferring authority to the Office of Water for salaries and benefits.
$250,000 in other fund expenditure authority for transferring authority from Resource Conservation and Forestry for
inflationary cost increases.
($350,000) in general funds, ($38,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (3.0) in FTE for eliminating the state
hemp regulatory program.
$150,000 in general funds for increases in inspection and enforcement travel, lab testing fees, rent, and state matches
for federal spill investigation, water, air quality, and pesticide programs.
(032) Resource Conservation & Forestry
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,366,212 $4,472,664 $2,245,188 $9,084,064 45.1
Office of Water Budget Transfer ($25,000) - - ($25,000) -
Agriculture & Environmental - - ($250,000) ($250,000) -
Services Budget Transfer
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - - - (4.0)
Appropriation $2,341,212 $4,472,664 $1,995,188 $8,809,064 41.1
($25,000) in general funds for transferring budget to the Office of Water for janitorial services.
($250,000) in other fund expenditure authority for transferring authority to Agriculture and Environmental Services for
inflationary cost increases.
(4.0) in FTE for a reduction in unutilized FTE.
(033) Animal Industry Board
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,059,560 $2,352,023 $387,923 $5,799,506 42.0
Bond/Lease Payment - - $57,735 $57,735 -
Adjustment
Appropriation $3,059,560 $2,352,023 $445,658 $5,857,241 42.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 12 1326
$57,735 in other fund expenditure authority for existing property insurance premiums for the Animal Disease Research
and Diagnostic Laboratory bond.
(0341) American Dairy Association - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $5,423,100 $5,423,100 -
Boards/Commissions - - $61,115 $61,115 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $5,484,215 $5,484,215 -
$61,115 in other fund expenditure authority for American Dairy Association operations.
(0342) Wheat Commission - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,038,492 $2,038,492 2.0
Boards/Commissions - - ($13,843) ($13,843) -
Operations
Appropriation - - $2,024,649 $2,024,649 2.0
($13,843) in other fund expenditure authority for reduced Wheat Commission operations.
(0343) Oilseeds Council - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $351,234 $351,234 -
Boards/Commissions - - $93,677 $93,677 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $444,911 $444,911 -
$93,677 in other fund expenditure authority for Oilseeds Council operations.
(0344) Soybean Research and Promotion Council - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $17,897,718 $17,897,718 9.0
Appropriation - - $17,897,718 $17,897,718 9.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Soybean Research and Promotion Council - Informational.
(0345) Brand Board - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $3,138,682 $3,138,682 35.0
Boards/Commissions - - - - -
Operations
Appropriation - - $3,138,682 $3,138,682 35.0
$1,500 in other fund expenditure authority and ($1,500) in other fund expenditure authority, totaling a change of $0, for
realigning the budget of the Brand Board.
(0346) Corn Utilization Council - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $6,069,937 $6,069,937 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 13 1326
Boards/Commissions - - $229,905 $229,905 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $6,299,842 $6,299,842 -
$229,905 in other fund expenditure authority for Corn Utilization Council operations.
(0347) Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $61,925 $61,925 -
Boards/Commissions - - $15,000 $15,000 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $76,925 $76,925 -
$15,000 in other fund expenditure authority for Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners operations.
(0348) Pulse Crops Council - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $69,428 $69,428 -
Boards/Commissions - - $550 $550 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $69,978 $69,978 -
$550 in other fund expenditure authority for Pulse Crops Council operations.
(035) State Fair
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $326,262 - $4,926,838 $5,253,100 21.5
State Fair Budget Transfer - - - - -
Appropriation $326,262 - $4,926,838 $5,253,100 21.5
$175,000 in other fund expenditure authority and ($175,000) in other fund expenditure authority, totaling a change of
$0, for realigning the State Fair budget to support salaries and benefits.
(036) Financial and Technical Assistance
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,579,753 $2,730,844 $1,148,698 $6,459,295 32.0
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($300,000) ($300,000) -
Appropriation $2,579,753 $2,730,844 $848,698 $6,159,295 32.0
($300,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(037) Office of Water
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,085,720 $5,782,233 $2,013,378 $9,881,331 50.0
Office of Water Budget Transfer $25,000 - $550,000 $575,000 -
Appropriation $2,110,720 $5,782,233 $2,563,378 $10,456,331 50.0
$25,000 in general funds and $550,000 in other fund expenditure authority for transferring budget from Agriculture and
Environmental Services and Resource Conservation and Forestry for salaries, benefits, and janitorial services.
(0380) Livestock Cleanup Fund - Informational
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 14 1326
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $765,000 $765,000 -
Appropriation - - $765,000 $765,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Livestock Cleanup Fund - Informational.
(0381) Regulated Response Fund - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,750,001 $1,750,001 -
Appropriation - - $1,750,001 $1,750,001 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Regulated Response Fund - Informational.
(0390) Petroleum Release Compensation
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $477,452 $477,452 3.0
Appropriation - - $477,452 $477,452 3.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Petroleum Release Compensation.
(0391) Petroleum Release Compensation - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,100,000 $2,100,000 -
Appropriation - - $2,100,000 $2,100,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Petroleum Release Compensation - Informational.
(03) DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL RESOURCES TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $16,499,500 $24,696,033 $57,205,732 $98,401,265 352.5
Adjustments ($271,000) - $277,139 $6,139 (7.0)
Appropriation $16,228,500 $24,696,033 $57,482,871 $98,407,404 345.5
Personal Services $12,686,659 $10,415,167 $12,293,139 $35,394,965
Operating Expenses $3,541,841 $14,280,866 $45,189,732 $63,012,439
Total $16,228,500 $24,696,033 $57,482,871 $98,407,404 345.5
Section 9.
(04) DEPARTMENT OF TOURISM
(0420) Tourism
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $8,750,000 $24,232,659 $32,982,659 34.7
American Rescue Plan Act - ($8,750,000) - ($8,750,000) -
Marketing Projects
Marketing and Advertising - - $550,427 $550,427 -
Finance Officer Budget Transfer - - - - -
Appropriation - - $24,783,086 $24,783,086 34.7
($8,750,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for the completion of marketing projects funded through the State
and Local Fiscal Recovery Funds grant program.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 15 1326
$550,427 in other fund expenditure authority for increased marketing and advertising efforts.
$140,000 in other fund expenditure authority and ($140,000) in other fund expenditure authority, totaling a change of
$0, for realigning the budget of the finance officer position.
(0441) Arts
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $1,535,707 $1,431,204 $2,966,911 4.0
State Art Grants - - $25,086 $25,086 -
Appropriation - $1,535,707 $1,456,290 $2,991,997 4.0
$25,086 in other fund expenditure authority for state art grants to nonprofit organizations.
(04) DEPARTMENT OF TOURISM TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $10,285,707 $25,663,863 $35,949,570 38.7
Adjustments - ($8,750,000) $575,513 ($8,174,487) -
Appropriation - $1,535,707 $26,239,376 $27,775,083 38.7
Personal Services $0 $75,299 $3,331,199 $3,406,498
Operating Expenses $0 $1,460,408 $22,908,177 $24,368,585
Total $0 $1,535,707 $26,239,376 $27,775,083 38.7
Section 10.
(06) DEPARTMENT OF GAME, FISH AND PARKS
(0601) Administration, Secretary of Game, Fish and Parks
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $229,970 - $4,128,265 $4,358,235 23.3
Appropriation $229,970 - $4,128,265 $4,358,235 23.3
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Administration, Secretary of Game, Fish and Parks.
(0610) Wildlife - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $24,090,870 $41,056,337 $65,147,207 297.5
Wildlife Special Projects - - ($234,000) ($234,000) -
Wildlife Budget Transfer - - - - -
Wildlife Fund Swap - $200,000 ($200,000) - -
Black Hills Shooting Range - $292,740 $147,780 $440,520 -
Operations
Wildlife Operations Adjustments - $908,059 $462,487 $1,370,546 -
Appropriation - $25,491,669 $41,232,604 $66,724,273 297.5
($234,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority for salaries and benefits.
$351,744 in other fund expenditure authority and ($351,744) in other fund expenditure authority, totaling a change of
$0, for realigning authority from Wildlife Special Projects to Administration and Law Enforcement based on how salaries
and benefits will be paid.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 16 1326
$200,000 in federal fund expenditure authority and ($200,000) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning authority
from Wildlife Special Projects to Law Enforcement based on how salaries and benefits will be paid.
$292,740 in federal fund expenditure authority and $147,780 in other fund expenditure authority for the operations of
the new Black Hills shooting range.
$908,059 in federal fund expenditure authority and $462,487 in other fund expenditure authority for wildlife operations
budget adjustments after implementing fee increases.
(0612) Wildlife, Development, and Improvement - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $6,712,500 $4,462,500 $11,175,000 -
Wildlife Capital Projects - ($4,724,000) $2,649,000 ($2,075,000) -
Appropriation - $1,988,500 $7,111,500 $9,100,000 -
($4,724,000) in federal fund expenditure authority and $2,649,000 in other fund expenditure authority for realigning and
decreasing the budget for wildlife capital projects.
(0620) State Parks and Recreation
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $6,015,783 $3,769,587 $24,915,897 $34,701,267 254.0
Parks and Recreation Fund - $60,000 ($60,000) - -
Swap
Bond/Lease Payment ($4,179) - - ($4,179) -
Adjustment
Appropriation $6,011,604 $3,829,587 $24,855,897 $34,697,088 254.0
$60,000 in federal fund expenditure authority and ($60,000) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning how
operations will be paid.
($4,179) in general funds for existing bond payment adjustments.
(0621) State Parks and Recreation - Development and Improvement
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $3,750,000 $9,595,000 $13,345,000 -
Parks and Recreation Capital - ($213,200) $3,294,800 $3,081,600 -
Projects
Appropriation - $3,536,800 $12,889,800 $16,426,600 -
($213,200) in federal fund expenditure authority and $3,294,800 in other fund expenditure authority for realigning and
increasing the budget for parks and recreation capital projects.
(0622) Snowmobile Trails - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,496,418 $1,496,418 9.1
Appropriation - - $1,496,418 $1,496,418 9.1
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Snowmobile Trails - Informational.
(06) DEPARTMENT OF GAME, FISH AND PARKS TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $6,245,753 $38,322,957 $85,654,417 $130,223,127 583.9
Adjustments ($4,179) ($3,476,401) $6,060,067 $2,579,487 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 17 1326
Appropriation $6,241,574 $34,846,556 $91,714,484 $132,802,614 583.9
Personal Services $3,769,558 $10,852,440 $33,694,980 $48,316,978
Operating Expenses $2,472,016 $23,994,116 $58,019,504 $84,485,636
Total $6,241,574 $34,846,556 $91,714,484 $132,802,614 583.9
Section 11.
(07) DEPARTMENT OF TRIBAL RELATIONS
(0710) Office of Tribal Relations
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $896,969 - $196,000 $1,092,969 7.0
Appropriation $896,969 - $196,000 $1,092,969 7.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Office of Tribal Relations.
(07) DEPARTMENT OF TRIBAL RELATIONS TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $896,969 - $196,000 $1,092,969 7.0
Adjustments - - - - -
Appropriation $896,969 - $196,000 $1,092,969 7.0
Personal Services $696,638 $0 $0 $696,638
Operating Expenses $200,331 $0 $196,000 $396,331
Total $896,969 $0 $196,000 $1,092,969 7.0
Section 12.
(08) DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
(081) Administration, Secretary of Social Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $15,734,144 $23,977,700 $28,467 $39,740,311 201.2
Federal Medical Assistance $21,973 ($21,973) - - -
Percentage Change
Sioux Falls One Stop Budget $60,234 - - $60,234 -
Transfer
Kinship Licensure Budget $1,932,944 $842,549 - $2,775,493 1.0
Transfer
IT Services Budget Transfer $305,270 - - $305,270 3.0
Discretionary Provider Inflation $66,373 $35,570 - $101,943 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $18,120,938 $24,833,846 $28,467 $42,983,251 205.2
$21,973 in general funds and ($21,973) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$60,234 in general funds for the Sioux Falls One Stop from Behavioral Health based on use of the building.
$1,932,944 in general funds, $842,549 in federal fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for transferring the budget
for centralized kinship licensing to Administration.
$305,270 in general funds and 3.0 in FTE for transferring technology services from Behavioral Health to centralize IT
operations.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 18 1326
$66,373 in general funds and $35,570 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(082) Economic Assistance
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $34,517,352 $130,879,334 $1,093,354 $166,490,040 356.5
Federal Medical Assistance $85,174 ($85,174) - - -
Percentage Change
Sioux Falls One Stop Budget $390,108 - - $390,108 -
Transfer
Medicaid Eligibility Staff Fund ($2,500,000) $2,500,000 - - -
Swap
Supplemental Nutrition $5,500,000 ($5,500,000) - - -
Assistance Program
Administration Fund Swap
Supplemental Nutrition - ($711,043) - ($711,043) -
Assistance Program Nutrition-
Education Elimination
Temporary Assistance for $427,000 $427,000 - $854,000 -
Needy Families Benefits
Discretionary Provider Inflation $529,647 $287,081 - $816,728 -
of 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($5,500,000) - ($5,500,000) -
Supplemental Nutrition $165,300 $55,100 - $220,400 2.0
Assistance Program Restriction
Waiver Implementation
Appropriation $39,114,581 $122,352,298 $1,093,354 $162,560,233 358.5
$85,174 in general funds and ($85,174) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$390,108 in general funds for the Sioux Falls One Stop from Behavioral Health based on use of the building.
($2,500,000) in general funds and $2,500,000 in federal fund expenditure authority for realigning the administrative
costs of Medicaid eligibility staff.
$5,500,000 in general funds and ($5,500,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for the federal shift in Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program administration costs.
($711,043) in federal fund expenditure authority for eliminating the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program-
Education.
$427,000 in general funds and $427,000 in federal fund expenditure authority for a partial restoration of benefits for
recipients of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families to the levels seen prior to the benefit reductions approved by the
Interim Rules Review Committee on July 15, 2025.
$529,647 in general funds and $287,081 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
($5,500,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
$165,300 in general funds, $55,100 in federal fund expenditure authority and 2.0 in FTE for implementing a restriction
waiver in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(083) Medical Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 19 1326
Base $394,588,787 $901,658,034 $280,701 $1,296,527,522 75.0
Sioux Falls One Stop Budget $42,611 - - $42,611 -
Transfer
Federal Medical Assistance $5,495,413 ($5,495,413) - - -
Percentage Change
Mandatory Provider Inflation $14,072,438 $17,118,717 - $31,191,155 -
Critical Access Hospitals $1,381,240 $1,418,760 - $2,800,000 -
Federally Qualified Health $3,407,579 $3,500,142 - $6,907,721 -
Centers
Medicaid Enrollees and ($7,100,000) ($7,292,864) - ($14,392,864) -
Utilization
Discretionary Provider Inflation $4,174,735 $10,080,685 - $14,255,420 -
of 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($10,000,000) - ($10,000,000) -
Appropriation $416,062,803 $910,988,061 $280,701 $1,327,331,565 75.0
$42,611 in general funds for the Sioux Falls One Stop from Behavioral Health based on use of the building.
$5,495,413 in general funds and ($5,495,413) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$14,072,438 in general funds and $17,118,717 in federal fund expenditure authority for mandatory inflation to Medicaid
and Medicare providers.
$1,381,240 in general funds and $1,418,760 in federal fund expenditure authority for supporting critical access hospitals.
$3,407,579 in general funds and $3,500,142 in federal fund expenditure authority for supporting federally qualified health
centers.
($7,100,000) in general funds and ($7,292,864) in federal fund expenditure authority for realigning the budget based on
actual Medicaid enrollees and utilization.
$4,174,735 in general funds and $10,080,685 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of
1.4%.
($10,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(084) Children's Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $71,416,406 $54,492,940 $4,932,930 $130,842,276 364.8
Sioux Falls One Stop Budget $531,230 - - $531,230 -
Transfer
Kinship Licensure Budget ($883,441) ($842,549) - ($1,725,990) -
Transfer
Federal Medical Assistance $488,002 ($488,002) - - -
Percentage Change
Discretionary Provider Inflation $659,742 $308,419 - $968,161 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $72,211,939 $53,470,808 $4,932,930 $130,615,677 364.8
$531,230 in general funds for the Sioux Falls One Stop from Behavioral Health based on use of the building.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 20 1326
($883,441) in general funds and ($842,549) in federal fund expenditure authority for transferring the budget for
centralized kinship licensing to Administration.
$488,002 in general funds and ($488,002) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$659,742 in general funds and $308,419 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(085) Behavioral Health
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $140,233,836 $72,197,075 $4,348,541 $216,779,452 554.0
Federal Medical Assistance $432,128 ($432,128) - - -
Percentage Change
Human Services Center - - - - -
Transfer
Sioux Falls One Stop Budget ($1,024,183) - - ($1,024,183) -
Transfer
Utility Cost Adjustment $28,958 - - $28,958 -
Food Contract Inflation $220,645 - - $220,645 -
IT Services Budget Transfer ($305,270) - - ($305,270) (3.0)
Kinship Licensure Budget ($1,049,503) - - ($1,049,503) (1.0)
Transfer
Discretionary Provider Inflation $1,285,394 $508,685 - $1,794,079 -
of 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - - - (30.0)
Opioid Settlement Project - - $9,000,000 $9,000,000 -
Grants
Appropriation $139,822,005 $72,273,632 $13,348,541 $225,444,178 520.0
$432,128 in general funds and ($432,128) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$15,054 in general funds and ($15,054) in general funds, totaling a change of $0, for transferring personal services to
operating expenses at the Human Services Center.
($1,024,183) in general funds for the Sioux Falls One Stop from Behavioral Health based on use of the building.
$28,958 in general funds for adjustments in utility expenses at the Human Services Center.
$220,645 in general funds for adjustments in the meal rates at the Human Services Center.
($305,270) in general funds and (3.0) in FTE for transferring technology services from Behavioral Health to centralize IT
operations.
($1,049,503) in general funds and (1.0) in FTE for transferring the budget for centralized kinship licensing to
Administration.
$1,285,394 in general funds and $508,685 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of
1.4%.
(30.0) in FTE for a reduction in unutilized FTE.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 21 1326
$9,000,000 in other fund expenditure authority for providing grants that establish new or expand resources to fill critical
service needs in preventing, treating, reducing the impact of opioid misuse, or addressing the underlying risks of opioid
misuse.
(0891) Board of Counselor Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $114,557 $114,557 -
Board of Counselor Examiners - - $72,987 $72,987 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $187,544 $187,544 -
$72,987 in other fund expenditure authority for Board of Counselor Examiners operations.
(0892) Board of Psychology Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $90,453 $90,453 -
Appropriation - - $90,453 $90,453 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Psychology Examiners - Informational.
(0893) Board of Social Work Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $135,869 $135,869 -
Board of Social Work Examiners - - $10,000 $10,000 -
Operations
Appropriation - - $145,869 $145,869 -
$10,000 in other fund expenditure authority for Board of Social Work Examiners operations.
(0894) Board of Addiction and Prevention Professionals - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $192,552 $192,552 -
Board of Addiction & Prevention - - $7,000 $7,000 -
Professionals Operations
Appropriation - - $199,552 $199,552 -
$7,000 in other fund expenditure authority for Board of Addiction and Prevention Professionals operations.
(08) DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $656,490,525 $1,183,205,083 $11,217,424 $1,850,913,032 1,551.5
Adjustments $28,841,741 $713,562 $9,089,987 $38,645,290 (28.0)
Appropriation $685,332,266 $1,183,918,645 $20,307,411 $1,889,558,322 1,523.5
Personal Services $89,015,106 $51,485,741 $2,991,918 $143,492,765
Operating Expenses $596,317,160 $1,132,432,904 $17,315,493 $1,746,065,557
Total $685,332,266 $1,183,918,645 $20,307,411 $1,889,558,322 1,523.5
Section 13.
(09) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
(0901) Administration, Secretary of Health
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 22 1326
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,648,116 $17,619,983 $846,850 $22,114,949 42.5
Federal Medical Assistance $7,895 ($7,895) - - -
Perchantage Change
Discretionary Provider Inflation $6,340 $6,512 - $12,852 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $3,662,351 $17,618,600 $846,850 $22,127,801 42.5
$7,895 in general funds and ($7,895) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical assistance
percentage.
$6,340 in general funds and $6,512 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(0903) Licensure and Accreditation
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,292,349 $5,733,808 $4,082,037 $14,108,194 71.5
Health & Safety Inspection Rate $78,606 - - $78,606 -
Appropriation $4,370,955 $5,733,808 $4,082,037 $14,186,800 71.5
$78,606 in general funds for an increase in the inspection rate for food and lodging establishments.
(0904) Family and Community Health
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $6,133,104 $54,696,795 $7,128,196 $67,958,095 199.5
COVID - 19 Stimulus Grants - ($8,000,000) - ($8,000,000) -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($500,000) ($500,000) -
Appropriation $6,133,104 $46,696,795 $6,628,196 $59,458,095 199.5
($8,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for reducing authority related to federal COVID-19 stimulus grants.
($500,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(0905) Laboratory Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $14,167,968 $5,298,827 $19,466,795 36.0
COVID - 19 Stimulus Grants - ($2,000,000) - ($2,000,000) -
Appropriation - $12,167,968 $5,298,827 $17,466,795 36.0
($2,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for reducing authority related to federal COVID-19 stimulus grants.
(0907) Tobacco Prevention
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $1,661,065 $2,020,174 $3,681,239 3.0
Appropriation - $1,661,065 $2,020,174 $3,681,239 3.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Tobacco Prevention.
(0908) Epidemiology, Surveillance & Informatics
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $423,732 $4,016,792 - $4,440,524 10.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 23 1326
Appropriation $423,732 $4,016,792 - $4,440,524 10.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Epidemiology, Surveillance & Informatics.
(09201) Board of Chiropractic Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $162,505 $162,505 1.0
Appropriation - - $162,505 $162,505 1.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Chiropractic Examiners - Informational.
(09202) Board of Dentistry - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $506,746 $506,746 -
Appropriation - - $506,746 $506,746 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Dentistry - Informational.
(09203) Board of Hearing Aid Dispensers and Audiologists - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $46,749 $46,749 -
Appropriation - - $46,749 $46,749 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Hearing Aid Dispensers and Audiologists - Informational.
(09204) Board of Funeral Service - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $114,111 $114,111 -
Appropriation - - $114,111 $114,111 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Funeral Service - Informational.
(09205) Board of Medical and Osteopathic Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,375,495 $1,375,495 8.0
Appropriation - - $1,375,495 $1,375,495 8.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Medical and Osteopathic Examiners - Informational.
(09206) Board of Nursing - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,119,128 $2,119,128 9.5
Appropriation - - $2,119,128 $2,119,128 9.5
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Nursing - Informational.
(09207) Board of Nursing Home Administrators - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $71,661 $71,661 -
Appropriation - - $71,661 $71,661 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 24 1326
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Nursing Home Administrators - Informational.
(09208) Board of Optometry - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $78,838 $78,838 -
Appropriation - - $78,838 $78,838 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Optometry - Informational.
(09209) Board of Pharmacy - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $496,991 $1,653,435 $2,150,426 6.4
Appropriation - $496,991 $1,653,435 $2,150,426 6.4
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Pharmacy - Informational.
(09210) Board of Podiatry Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $30,954 $30,954 -
Appropriation - - $30,954 $30,954 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Podiatry Examiners - Informational.
(09211) Board of Massage Therapy - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $129,102 $129,102 -
Appropriation - - $129,102 $129,102 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Massage Therapy - Informational.
(09212) Board of Speech Language Pathology - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $75,833 $75,833 -
Appropriation - - $75,833 $75,833 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Speech Language Pathology - Informational.
(09213) Board of Certified Professional Midwives - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $22,028 $22,028 -
Appropriation - - $22,028 $22,028 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Certified Professional Midwives - Informational.
(09214) Board of Physical Therapy - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $160,648 $160,648 -
Appropriation - - $160,648 $160,648 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 25 1326
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Physical Therapy - Informational.
(09) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $14,497,301 $98,393,402 $25,923,317 $138,814,020 387.4
Adjustments $92,841 ($10,001,383) ($500,000) ($10,408,542) -
Appropriation $14,590,142 $88,392,019 $25,423,317 $128,405,478 387.4
Personal Services $8,018,696 $24,193,708 $9,794,287 $42,006,691
Operating Expenses $6,571,446 $64,198,311 $15,629,030 $86,398,787
Total $14,590,142 $88,392,019 $25,423,317 $128,405,478 387.4
Section 14.
(10) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND REGULATION
(1001) Administration, Secretary of Labor
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,593,588 $14,184,493 $2,466,141 $18,244,222 53.7
State Digital Equity Capacity - ($867,000) - ($867,000) -
Grant
State Apprenticeship Agency - - $455,444 $455,444 3.0
Apprenticeship Budget Transfer - - $445,211 $445,211 4.0
Discretionary Provider Inflation $26,647 $10,658 - $37,305 -
at 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($1,000,000) - ($1,000,000) -
Appropriation $1,620,235 $12,328,151 $3,366,796 $17,315,182 60.7
($867,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for eliminating authority related to the State Digital Equity Capacity
Grant Program.
$455,444 in other fund expenditure authority and 3.0 in FTE for creating a new State Apprenticeship Agency program.
$445,211 in other fund expenditure authority and 4.0 in FTE for centralizing the budget for apprenticeships.
$26,647 in general funds and $10,658 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
($1,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1004) Reemployment Assistance
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $9,188,132 - $9,188,132 76.0
Reemployment Assistance - - - - -
Budget Transfer
Appropriation - $9,188,132 - $9,188,132 76.0
($186,617) in federal fund expenditure authority and ($186,617) in federal fund expenditure authority, totaling a change
of $0, for realigning the Reemployment Assistance budget for salaries and benefits.
(1005) Job Service
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,194,146 $12,417,736 $445,211 $14,057,093 126.5
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 26 1326
State Apprenticeship Agency - ($455,444) - ($455,444) (3.0)
Apprenticeship Budget Transfer - - ($445,211) ($445,211) (4.0)
Appropriation $1,194,146 $11,962,292 - $13,156,438 119.5
($455,444) in federal fund expenditure authority and (3.0) in FTE for creating a new State Apprenticeship Agency
program.
($445,211) in other fund expenditure authority and (4.0) in FTE for centralizing the budget for apprenticeships.
(1006) State Labor Law Administration
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $979,869 $405,973 $634,440 $2,020,282 15.3
Appropriation $979,869 $405,973 $634,440 $2,020,282 15.3
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit State Labor Law Administration.
(1031) Board of Accountancy - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $472,863 $472,863 2.7
Appropriation - - $472,863 $472,863 2.7
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Accountancy - Informational.
(1032) Board of Barber Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $88,818 $88,818 0.4
Appropriation - - $88,818 $88,818 0.4
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Barber Examiners - Informational.
(1033) Cosmetology Commission - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $580,513 $580,513 4.8
Appropriation - - $580,513 $580,513 4.8
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Cosmetology Commission - Informational.
(1034) Plumbing Commission - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,217,581 $1,217,581 9.3
Appropriation - - $1,217,581 $1,217,581 9.3
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Plumbing Commission - Informational.
(1035) Board of Technical Professions - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $613,925 $613,925 3.3
Appropriation - - $613,925 $613,925 3.3
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Board of Technical Professions - Informational.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 27 1326
(1036) Electrical Commission - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $2,831,137 $2,831,137 23.3
Appropriation - - $2,831,137 $2,831,137 23.3
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Electrical Commission - Informational.
(1037) Real Estate Commission - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $766,782 $766,782 5.2
Appropriation - - $766,782 $766,782 5.2
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Real Estate Commission - Informational.
(1038) Abstracters Board of Examiners - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $69,568 $69,568 -
Appropriation - - $69,568 $69,568 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Abstracters Board of Examiners - Informational.
(1039) South Dakota Athletic Commission - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $79,035 $79,035 -
Appropriation - - $79,035 $79,035 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit South Dakota Athletic Commission - Informational.
(10610) Banking
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $7,611,601 $7,611,601 44.5
Financial Institution Examiner - - $120,662 $120,662 1.0
Appropriation - - $7,732,263 $7,732,263 45.5
$120,662 in other fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for a new financial institution examiner.
(10612) Trust Captive Insurance Company - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $260,850 $260,850 -
Insurance Adjustment - - ($220,000) ($220,000) -
Appropriation - - $40,850 $40,850 -
($220,000) in other fund expenditure authority for an adjustment in insurance policy billings.
(1063) Insurance
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $46,757 $4,939,160 $4,985,917 40.7
Appropriation - $46,757 $4,939,160 $4,985,917 40.7
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 28 1326
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Insurance.
(10) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND REGULATION TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,767,603 $36,243,091 $23,077,625 $63,088,319 405.7
Adjustments $26,647 ($2,311,786) $356,106 ($1,929,033) 1.0
Appropriation $3,794,250 $33,931,305 $23,433,731 $61,159,286 406.7
Personal Services $1,858,043 $20,369,810 $15,924,227 $38,152,080
Operating Expenses $1,936,207 $13,561,495 $7,509,504 $23,007,206
Total $3,794,250 $33,931,305 $23,433,731 $61,159,286 406.7
Section 15.
(11) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(111) General Operations
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $729,132 $57,098,320 $208,466,639 $266,294,091 1,014.3
Long Term Railroad Capital - $40,587,309 $3,431,271 $44,018,580 -
Planning
Transit Provider Grants - $754,506 $26,656 $781,162 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($10,000,000) - ($10,000,000) -
Appropriation $729,132 $88,440,135 $211,924,566 $301,093,833 1,014.3
$40,587,309 in federal fund expenditure authority and $3,431,271 in other fund expenditure authority for railroad
construction and maintenance projects.
$754,506 in federal fund expenditure authority and $26,656 in other fund expenditure authority for transit provider
grants.
($10,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(112) Construction Contracts - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $795,068,873 $194,544,285 $989,613,158 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($20,000,000) - ($20,000,000) -
Appropriation - $775,068,873 $194,544,285 $969,613,158 -
($20,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(11) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $729,132 $852,167,193 $403,010,924 $1,255,907,249 1,014.3
Adjustments - $11,341,815 $3,457,927 $14,799,742 -
Appropriation $729,132 $863,509,008 $406,468,851 $1,270,706,991 1,014.3
Personal Services $703,263 $15,400,894 $89,744,480 $105,848,637
Operating Expenses $25,869 $848,108,114 $316,724,371 $1,164,858,354
Total $729,132 $863,509,008 $406,468,851 $1,270,706,991 1,014.3
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 29 1326
Section 16.
(12) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(1201) General Administration
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,168,167 $6,718,238 $435,560 $11,321,965 48.5
Part-Time Secretary Position - ($24,507) - ($24,507) (0.5)
Internal Controls Officer $51,058 $34,038 - $85,096 0.5
COVID-19 Stimulus Grants - ($2,607,000) - ($2,607,000) -
Technology Product Owner - - $100,000 $100,000 1.0
Appropriation $4,219,225 $4,120,769 $535,560 $8,875,554 49.5
($24,507) in federal fund expenditure authority and (0.5) in FTE for eliminating a part-time secretary position.
$51,058 in general funds, $34,038 in federal fund expenditure authority and 0.5 in FTE for a new internal controls officer
position.
($2,607,000) in federal fund expenditure authority for reducing authority related to COVID-19 stimulus grants.
$100,000 in other fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for a new technology product owner position.
(1210) Workforce Education Fund
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,125,000 $1,125,000 -
Appropriation - - $1,125,000 $1,125,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Workforce Education Fund.
(1211) State Aid to General Education
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $619,833,511 - - $619,833,511 -
Target Teacher Salary Inflation $11,698,382 - - $11,698,382 -
of 1.4%
K-12 Enrollment Utilization ($21,298,563) - - ($21,298,563) -
Owner-Occupied General Fund - - $55,896,576 $55,896,576 -
Levy Reduction
Appropriation $610,233,330 - $55,896,576 $666,129,906 -
$11,698,382 in general funds for target teacher salary inflation of 1.4%.
($21,298,563) in general funds for state aid to general education, due to projected declines in state aid fall enrollment.
$55,896,576 in other fund expenditure authority for state aid to general education, from the homeowner property tax
reduction fund, to offset a reduction in the owner-occupied general fund levy for property taxes payable in 2027.
(1212) State Aid to Special Education
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $103,049,903 - - $103,049,903 -
State Aid to Special Education $2,860,236 - - $2,860,236 -
Rebase
Disability Level Funding $2,657,451 - - $2,657,451 -
Allocations Inflation of 1.4%
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 30 1326
Extraordinary Expenses in $682,514 - - $682,514 -
Special Education
Appropriation $109,250,104 - - $109,250,104 -
$2,860,236 in general funds for state aid to special education, due to the biennial rebase of the disability level funding
allocations and projected disability level child counts.
$2,657,451 in general funds for disability level funding allocations inflation of 1.4%.
$682,514 in general funds for an increase in the amount available for extraordinary expenses in special education.
(1213) Sparsity Payments
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,615,722 - - $2,615,722 -
Sparsity Payments $14,944 - - $14,944 -
Sparsity Payment Inflation of $11,894 - - $11,894 -
1.4%
Appropriation $2,642,560 - - $2,642,560 -
$14,944 in general funds for payments to sparse school districts.
$11,894 in general funds for sparsity payment inflation of 1.4%.
(1216) National Board Certified Teachers and Counselors
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $45,000 - - $45,000 -
Appropriation $45,000 - - $45,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit National Board Certified Teachers and Counselors.
(1219) Technology in Schools
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $12,032,133 - $2,094,957 $14,127,090 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($150,000) ($150,000) -
Appropriation $12,032,133 - $1,944,957 $13,977,090 -
($150,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1222) Technical Colleges
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $42,280,120 - $185,696 $42,465,816 3.0
Technical Colleges Enrollment $1,688,519 - - $1,688,519 -
Changes
Bond/Lease Payment ($2,098) - - ($2,098) -
Adjustment
Maintenance and Repair $211,258 - - $211,258 -
Technical Colleges Per-Student $535,933 - - $535,933 -
Allocation Inflation of 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($185,696) ($185,696) -
Appropriation $44,713,732 - - $44,713,732 3.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 31 1326
$1,688,519 in general funds for formula funding based on FTE student enrollments.
($2,098) in general funds for existing bond payment adjustments.
$211,258 in general funds for maintenance and repair at 1.25% of replacement value.
$535,933 in general funds for technical colleges per-student allocation inflation of 1.4%.
($185,696) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1232) Education Resources
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $10,674,451 $235,031,715 $1,137,857 $246,844,023 86.0
Dual Credit Program $270,688 - - $270,688 -
National Career Readiness ($450,000) - - ($450,000) -
Certificate Testing
Federal Medical Assistance $4,834 ($4,834) - - -
Percentage Change
State Personnel Development - $589,352 - $589,352 -
Grant
Professional Learning Platform - - $212,030 $212,030 -
Reduced-Price School Meal $592,224 - - $592,224 -
Reimbursement
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($150,000) ($150,000) -
Appropriation $11,092,197 $235,616,233 $1,199,887 $247,908,317 86.0
$270,688 in general funds for the dual credit program.
($450,000) in general funds for eliminating funding for National Career Readiness Certificate testing.
$4,834 in general funds and ($4,834) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical assistance
percentage.
$589,352 in federal fund expenditure authority for the new State Personnel Development Grant.
$212,030 in other fund expenditure authority for the existing professional learning platform.
$592,224 in general funds for reimbursing school districts for meals served to students eligible for reduced-price meals.
($150,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1242) History
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,961,762 $1,396,050 $2,083,164 $7,440,976 41.0
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($200,000) ($200,000) -
Appropriation $3,961,762 $1,396,050 $1,883,164 $7,240,976 41.0
($200,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1243) Library Services
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 32 1326
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,557,714 $1,399,443 $27,900 $2,985,057 18.0
Appropriation $1,557,714 $1,399,443 $27,900 $2,985,057 18.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Library Services.
(12) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $800,218,483 $244,545,446 $7,090,134 $1,051,854,063 196.5
Adjustments ($470,726) ($2,012,951) $55,522,910 $53,039,233 1.0
Appropriation $799,747,757 $242,532,495 $62,613,044 $1,104,893,296 197.5
Personal Services $8,708,982 $8,415,554 $1,783,126 $18,907,662
Operating Expenses $791,038,775 $234,116,941 $60,829,918 $1,085,985,634
Total $799,747,757 $242,532,495 $62,613,044 $1,104,893,296 197.5
Section 17.
(14) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
(1410) Administration, Secretary of Public Safety
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,375,259 $999,608 $13,195,539 $15,570,406 112.0
Internal Control Coordinator $90,603 - - $90,603 1.0
Weights and Measures $29,529 - - $29,529 -
Inspection Rate
Appropriation $1,495,391 $999,608 $13,195,539 $15,690,538 113.0
$90,603 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for a new internal control coordinator position.
$29,529 in general funds for an increase in the rate for Weights and Measures inspections.
(1421) Highway Patrol
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,919,836 $4,360,910 $38,205,048 $44,485,794 285.0
Highway Safety Budget Transfer - - - - -
Crash Assistance Program - $132,000 - $132,000 -
Increase
Communication Centers $37,255 - - $37,255 -
Contract Inflation
Appropriation $1,957,091 $4,492,910 $38,205,048 $44,655,049 285.0
$125,850 in federal fund expenditure authority and ($125,850) in federal fund expenditure authority, totaling a change
of $0, for realigning the budget of Highway Patrol for speed and driving under the influence enforcement.
$132,000 in federal fund expenditure authority for increased grant funding for the Crash Assistance Program to support
victim witness specialists.
$37,255 in general funds for the increased cost of contracts with State Radio communication centers in Rapid City and
Pierre.
(1431) Emergency Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 33 1326
Base $3,940,708 $8,450,575 $1,182,886 $13,574,169 74.8
Volunteer Fire Assistance - ($426,587) - ($426,587) -
Program Elimination
State Fire Assistance Program $435,041 ($647,171) - ($212,130) -
Fund Swap
Eastern Fire Management Office $160,912 - - $160,912 -
Appropriation $4,536,661 $7,376,817 $1,182,886 $13,096,364 74.8
($426,587) in federal fund expenditure authority for eliminating the Volunteer Fire Assistance program.
$435,041 in general funds and ($647,171) in federal fund expenditure authority for realigning the funding for the State
Fire Assistance program.
$160,912 in general funds for creating a fire management office in the eastern half of the state.
(1441) Criminal Justice Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $747,941 $21,906,563 $3,164,895 $25,819,399 23.0
Law Enforcement - - - - -
Telecommunications System
Budget Transfer
Program Manager to Cyber - - - - 1.0
Analyst Budget Transfer
Appropriation $747,941 $21,906,563 $3,164,895 $25,819,399 24.0
$24,719 in other fund expenditure authority and ($24,719) in other fund expenditure authority, totaling a change of $0,
for realigning the budget of the Law Enforcement Telecommunications System to support salaries and benefits.
1.0 in FTE for transferring a position from the 911 Coordination Board.
(1451) 911 Coordination Board - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - $250,000 $4,649,185 $4,899,185 2.0
911 Coordination Board Grant - - $1,000,000 $1,000,000 -
Program
911 Coordination Board - - $741,169 $741,169 -
Contract Inflation
Program Manager to Cyber - - ($86,933) ($86,933) (1.0)
Analyst Budget Transfer
Appropriation - $250,000 $6,303,421 $6,553,421 1.0
$1,000,000 in other fund expenditure authority for a new grant program to support 911 dispatch centers.
$741,169 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of contracts with entities doing work for the 911
Coordination Board.
($86,933) in other fund expenditure authority and (1.0) in FTE for transferring a position to Homeland Security.
(1461) One-Call Board - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,404,787 $1,404,787 2.0
Appropriation - - $1,404,787 $1,404,787 2.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 34 1326
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit One-Call Board - Informational.
(14) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $7,983,744 $35,967,656 $61,802,340 $105,753,740 498.8
Adjustments $753,340 ($941,758) $1,654,236 $1,465,818 1.0
Appropriation $8,737,084 $35,025,898 $63,456,576 $107,219,558 499.8
Personal Services $4,973,651 $6,146,323 $37,396,473 $48,516,447
Operating Expenses $3,763,433 $28,879,575 $26,060,103 $58,703,111
Total $8,737,084 $35,025,898 $63,456,576 $107,219,558 499.8
Section 18.
(15) BOARD OF REGENTS
(150) Board of Regents Central Office
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $26,543,103 $6,053,166 $49,735,568 $82,331,837 66.5
Maintenance and Repair $147,833 - - $147,833 -
Bond/Lease Payment ($5,279) - - ($5,279) -
Adjustment
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($5,600,000) ($6,000,000) ($11,600,000) (1.0)
Appropriation $26,685,657 $453,166 $43,735,568 $70,874,391 65.5
$147,833 in general funds for maintenance and repair at 1.25% of replacement value.
($5,279) in general funds for existing bond payment adjustments.
($5,600,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($6,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (1.0) in FTE
for a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1516) Research Pool
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,072,951 - - $4,072,951 -
Appropriation $4,072,951 - - $4,072,951 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Research Pool.
(1517) South Dakota Scholarships
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $6,572,724 - - $6,572,724 -
Post-Secondary Scholarship $2,919 - - $2,919 -
Grant Adjustment
Appropriation $6,575,643 - - $6,575,643 -
$2,919 in general funds for the existing post-secondary scholarship grant.
(1520) University of South Dakota
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $53,968,040 $13,553,651 $107,839,114 $175,360,805 1,074.9
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 35 1326
Utility Cost Adjustment ($226,541) - - ($226,541) -
Sales and Services - - $2,450,000 $2,450,000 -
Room and Board Utilization - - $350,000 $350,000 -
Aquatics Facility - - $150,000 $150,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($250,000) ($3,000,000) ($3,250,000) (3.0)
Appropriation $53,741,499 $13,303,651 $107,789,114 $174,834,264 1,071.9
($226,541) in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
$2,450,000 in other fund expenditure authority for increased sales and services.
$350,000 in other fund expenditure authority for existing room and board cost increases.
$150,000 in other fund expenditure authority for the operations of a new University of South Dakota Wellness Center
aquatics facility.
($250,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($3,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (3.0) in FTE for
a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1522) University of South Dakota Law School
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,697,558 $91,567 $3,904,151 $6,693,276 34.3
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($50,000) ($250,000) ($300,000) -
Appropriation $2,697,558 $41,567 $3,654,151 $6,393,276 34.3
($50,000) in federal fund expenditure authority and ($250,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in
unutilized authority.
(1525) University of South Dakota School of Medicine
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $32,304,212 $13,404,570 $27,006,891 $72,715,673 356.1
Physician Contracts Budget - - - - -
Transfer
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($1,000,000) ($3,000,000) ($4,000,000) (2.0)
Appropriation $32,304,212 $12,404,570 $24,006,891 $68,715,673 354.1
$52,433 in general funds and ($52,433) in general funds, totaling a change of $0, to realign the budget for physician
contracts.
($1,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($3,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (2.0) in FTE
for a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1530) South Dakota State University
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $72,948,822 $30,298,342 $196,260,467 $299,507,631 1,580.7
Utility Cost Adjustment $730,234 - - $730,234 -
Room and Board Utilization - - $2,500,000 $2,500,000 7.0
Student Services - - $3,500,000 $3,500,000 12.0
First Day Access for Books - - $1,500,000 $1,500,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($250,000) ($3,500,000) ($3,750,000) -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 36 1326
Appropriation $73,679,056 $30,048,342 $200,260,467 $303,987,865 1,599.7
$730,234 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
$2,500,000 in other fund expenditure authority and 7.0 in FTE for existing room and board cost increases.
$3,500,000 in other fund expenditure authority and 12.0 in FTE for increased student services.
$1,500,000 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased use of existing First Day Access for Books software.
($250,000) in federal fund expenditure authority and ($3,500,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in
unutilized authority.
(1533) SDSU Extension
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $11,032,235 $9,454,078 $3,038,621 $23,524,934 185.4
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($1,000,000) ($200,000) ($1,200,000) (3.0)
Appropriation $11,032,235 $8,454,078 $2,838,621 $22,324,934 182.4
($1,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($200,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (3.0) in FTE for
a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1536) Agricultural Experiment Station
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $15,897,987 $27,506,154 $20,545,254 $63,949,395 244.3
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($750,000) ($1,500,000) ($2,250,000) (40.0)
Appropriation $15,897,987 $26,756,154 $19,045,254 $61,699,395 204.3
($750,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($1,500,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (40.0) in FTE for
a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1540) SD School of Mines and Technology
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $25,436,291 $17,138,005 $44,837,336 $87,411,632 448.4
Utility Cost Adjustment $169,091 - - $169,091 -
Room and Board Utilization - - $250,000 $250,000 -
Student Services - - $750,000 $750,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($250,000) ($1,000,000) ($1,250,000) (5.0)
Appropriation $25,605,382 $16,888,005 $44,837,336 $87,330,723 443.4
$169,091 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
$250,000 in other fund expenditure authority for existing room and board cost increases.
$750,000 in other fund expenditure authority for increased student services.
($250,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($1,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (5.0) in FTE for
a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1550) Northern State University
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 37 1326
Base $17,571,400 $2,376,019 $27,082,910 $47,030,329 321.1
Utility Cost Adjustment $15,560 - - $15,560 -
Room and Board Utilization - - $300,000 $300,000 -
Sponsored Programs Director - - $127,000 $127,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($500,000) ($1,000,000) ($1,500,000) (5.0)
Appropriation $17,586,960 $1,876,019 $26,509,910 $45,972,889 316.1
$15,560 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
$300,000 in other fund expenditure authority for existing room and board cost increases.
$127,000 in other fund expenditure authority for new director of sponsored programs position.
($500,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($1,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (5.0) in FTE for
a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(1551) NSU Center for Statewide High School E-Learning
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $4,290,614 - - $4,290,614 40.9
Appropriation $4,290,614 - - $4,290,614 40.9
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit NSU Center for Statewide High School E-Learning.
(1560) Black Hills State University
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $16,721,674 $5,578,792 $29,516,304 $51,816,770 336.5
Utility Cost Adjustment $30,238 - - $30,238 -
Room and Board Utilization - - $100,000 $100,000 -
Student Services - - $50,000 $50,000 -
Academic & Athletic Camps - - $275,000 $275,000 -
Grant & Contract Inflation - - $100,000 $100,000 -
Auxiliary System - - $575,000 $575,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($750,000) ($1,000,000) ($1,750,000) (1.0)
Appropriation $16,751,912 $4,828,792 $29,616,304 $51,197,008 335.5
$30,238 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
$100,000 in other fund expenditure authority for existing room and board cost increases.
$50,000 in other fund expenditure authority for existing student services.
$275,000 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of existing academic and athletic camps.
$100,000 in other fund expenditure authority for a new grant and contract inflation.
$575,000 in other fund expenditure authority for increased auxiliary systems costs.
($750,000) in federal fund expenditure authority, ($1,000,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (1.0) in FTE for
a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 38 1326
(1570) Dakota State University
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $16,029,465 $5,217,130 $45,207,226 $66,453,821 344.8
Utility Cost Adjustment $273,679 - - $273,679 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($1,000,000) ($4,750,000) ($5,750,000) -
Appropriation $16,303,144 $4,217,130 $40,457,226 $60,977,500 344.8
$273,679 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
($1,000,000) in federal fund expenditure authority and ($4,750,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction
in unutilized authority.
(1580) SD Services for the Deaf
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,127,199 - $468,673 $3,595,872 26.0
Utility Cost Adjustment $4,176 - - $4,176 -
Summer Outreach Salaries - - $25,000 $25,000 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($50,000) ($50,000) -
Appropriation $3,131,375 - $443,673 $3,575,048 26.0
$4,176 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
$25,000 in other fund expenditure authority for increased summer outreach programming staff wages.
($50,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1590) SD School for the Blind and Visually Impaired
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,998,597 $93,908 $412,778 $4,505,283 45.6
Utility Cost Adjustment $8,199 - - $8,199 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($50,000) ($50,000) (2.0)
Appropriation $4,006,796 $93,908 $362,778 $4,463,482 43.6
$8,199 in general funds for utility cost adjustments.
($50,000) in other fund expenditure authority and (2.0) in FTE for a reduction in unutilized authority and FTE.
(15) BOARD OF REGENTS TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $313,212,872 $130,765,382 $555,855,293 $999,833,547 5,105.5
Adjustments $1,150,109 ($11,400,000) ($12,298,000) ($22,547,891) (43.0)
Appropriation $314,362,981 $119,365,382 $543,557,293 $977,285,656 5,062.5
Personal Services $258,292,816 $54,483,285 $273,452,879 $586,228,980
Operating Expenses $56,070,165 $64,882,097 $270,104,414 $391,056,676
Total $314,362,981 $119,365,382 $543,557,293 $977,285,656 5,062.5
Section 19.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 39 1326
(16) DEPARTMENT OF THE MILITARY
(1611) Adjutant General
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,417,978 $10,306 $29,254 $3,457,538 5.3
National Guard Tuition ($250,000) - - ($250,000) -
Assistance
Assistant Adjutant General $48,750 - - $48,750 -
National Guard Museum - - $20,000 $20,000 -
Maintenance
Unutilized FTE and Authority - ($10,306) - ($10,306) -
Appropriation $3,216,728 - $49,254 $3,265,982 5.3
($250,000) in general funds for realigning the budget of the National Guard Tuition Assistance Program with lower
utilization.
$48,750 in general funds for a new assistant adjutant general position.
$20,000 in other fund expenditure authority for the maintenance and repair of the National Guard Museum.
($10,306) in federal fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(1621) Army Guard
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,198,774 $18,162,031 - $21,360,805 63.1
Utility Cost Adjustment $30,514 $100,431 - $130,945 -
Maintenance and Repair $65,418 $74,379 - $139,797 -
Appropriation $3,294,706 $18,336,841 - $21,631,547 63.1
$30,514 in general funds and $100,431 in federal fund expenditure authority for adjustments in utility expenses.
$65,418 in general funds and $74,379 in federal fund expenditure authority for maintenance and repair at 1.25% of
replacement value.
(1624) Air Guard
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $646,580 $8,524,356 - $9,170,936 48.0
Utility Cost Adjustment $14,159 $42,478 - $56,637 -
Appropriation $660,739 $8,566,834 - $9,227,573 48.0
$14,159 in general funds and $42,478 in federal fund expenditure authority for adjustments in utility expenses.
(16) DEPARTMENT OF THE MILITARY TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $7,263,332 $26,696,693 $29,254 $33,989,279 116.4
Adjustments ($91,159) $206,982 $20,000 $135,823 -
Appropriation $7,172,173 $26,903,675 $49,254 $34,125,102 116.4
Personal Services $1,545,220 $8,737,971 $0 $10,283,191
Operating Expenses $5,626,953 $18,165,704 $49,254 $23,841,911
Total $7,172,173 $26,903,675 $49,254 $34,125,102 116.4
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 40 1326
Section 20.
(17) DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS
(1711) Veterans' Benefits and Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,396,767 $285,483 $61,080 $2,743,330 22.0
Appropriation $2,396,767 $285,483 $61,080 $2,743,330 22.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Veterans' Benefits and Services.
(1721) State Veterans' Home
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $3,104,352 $3,188,035 $6,780,829 $13,073,216 118.2
Federal Medical Assistance $51,681 ($51,681) - - -
Percentage Change
Utility Cost Adjustment - - $31,189 $31,189 -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - - - (5.0)
Appropriation $3,156,033 $3,136,354 $6,812,018 $13,104,405 113.2
$51,681 in general funds and ($51,681) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$31,189 in other fund expenditure authority for adjustments in utility expenses.
(5.0) in FTE for a reduction in unutilized FTE.
(1731) State Veterans' Cemetery
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $176,721 - $359,394 $536,115 7.0
State Veterans' Cemetery - - $29,295 $29,295 -
Maintenance Costs
Appropriation $176,721 - $388,689 $565,410 7.0
$29,295 in other fund expenditure authority for utility and maintenance costs related to the expansion of the State
Veterans’ Cemetery.
(17) DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $5,677,840 $3,473,518 $7,201,303 $16,352,661 147.2
Adjustments $51,681 ($51,681) $60,484 $60,484 (5.0)
Appropriation $5,729,521 $3,421,837 $7,261,787 $16,413,145 142.2
Personal Services $4,997,247 $3,366,017 $3,364,859 $11,728,123
Operating Expenses $732,274 $55,820 $3,896,928 $4,685,022
Total $5,729,521 $3,421,837 $7,261,787 $16,413,145 142.2
Section 21.
(18) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1811) Administration
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 41 1326
Base $6,513,390 $993,528 - $7,506,918 33.0
Appropriation $6,513,390 $993,528 - $7,506,918 33.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Administration.
(1821) Mike Durfee State Prison
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $32,135,358 $257,954 - $32,393,312 224.0
Food Contract Inflation ($352,007) - - ($352,007) -
Adult Corrections Population $620,275 - - $620,275 -
Change
Utility Cost Adjustment $17,256 - - $17,256 -
Appropriation $32,420,882 $257,954 - $32,678,836 224.0
($352,007) in general funds for adjustments in the meal rates at the Mike Durfee State Prison, Rapid City Minimum
Center, and Yankton Minimum Center.
$620,275 in general funds for adjustments in food service expenses based on the projected average daily offender
population at the Mike Durfee State Prison, Rapid City Minimum Center, and Yankton Minimum Center.
$17,256 in general funds for adjustments in utility expenses at the Mike Durfee State Prison, Rapid City Minimum Center,
and Yankton Minimum Center.
(1822) State Penitentiary
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $38,533,091 $94,702 $130,078 $38,757,871 317.0
Food Contract Inflation $142,496 - - $142,496 -
Adult Corrections Population ($72,957) - - ($72,957) -
Change
Correctional Officers Budget $763,924 - - $763,924 10.0
Transfer
Utility Cost Adjustment ($400,522) - - ($400,522) -
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - - - (10.0)
Appropriation $38,966,032 $94,702 $130,078 $39,190,812 317.0
$142,496 in general funds for adjustments in the meal rates at the State Penitentiary, Jameson Prison Annex, and Sioux
Falls Minimum Center.
($72,957) in general funds for adjustments in food service expenses based on the projected average daily offender
population at the State Penitentiary, Jameson Prison Annex, and Sioux Falls Minimum Center.
$763,924 in general funds and 10.0 in FTE for the transfer of correctional officers from the Pierre Minimum Center to the
State Penitentiary and the Jameson Prison Annex, due to the decommissioning of the Pierre Minimum Center.
($400,522) in general funds for adjustments in utility expenses.
(10.0) in FTE for a reduction in unutilized FTE.
(1823) Women's Prison
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $11,079,074 $70,833 - $11,149,907 89.0
Food Contract Inflation $26,163 - - $26,163 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 42 1326
Adult Corrections Population ($209,755) - - ($209,755) -
Change
Utility Cost Adjustment $15,937 - - $15,937 -
Pierre Minimum Center ($1,229,633) - - ($1,229,633) (6.0)
Decommissioning
Correctional Officers Budget ($763,924) - - ($763,924) (10.0)
Transfer
Appropriation $8,917,862 $70,833 - $8,988,695 73.0
$26,163 in general funds for adjustments in the meal rates.
($209,755) in general funds for adjustments in food service expenses based on the projected average daily offender
population at the South Dakota Women's Prison and Pierre Minimum Center.
$15,937 in general funds for adjustments in utility expenses.
($1,229,633) in general funds and (6.0) in FTE for the permanent closure of the Pierre Minimum Center.
($763,924) in general funds and (10.0) in FTE for the transfer of correctional officers from the Pierre Minimum Center to
the State Penitentiary and the Jameson Prison Annex, due to the decommissioning of the Pierre Minimum Center.
(1824) Pheasantland Industries
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $5,174,060 $5,174,060 18.0
Appropriation - - $5,174,060 $5,174,060 18.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Pheasantland Industries.
(1825) Rapid City Correctional Facility
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - - - -
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $761,558 - - $761,558 7.0
Administration
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $227,664 - - $227,664 1.0
Clothing Services
Food Contract Inflation $26,911 - - $26,911 -
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $497,987 - - $497,987 -
Food Services
Adult Corrections Population $200,634 - - $200,634 -
Change
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $54,454 - - $54,454 -
Prisoner Compensation
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $986,366 - - $986,366 10.0
Education and Programs
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $1,549,762 - - $1,549,762 16.0
Housing Unit Management
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $6,732,583 - - $6,732,583 80.0
Security Operations
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $1,066,008 - - $1,066,008 3.0
Physical Plant
Appropriation $12,103,927 - - $12,103,927 117.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 43 1326
$761,558 in general funds and 7.0 in FTE for the costs of Administration within the new Rapid City Correctional Facility.
$227,664 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for the costs of Clothing Services within the new Rapid City Correctional Facility.
$26,911 in general funds for adjustments in the meal rates.
$497,987 in general funds for the costs of Food Services within the new Rapid City Correctional Facility.
$200,634 in general funds for adjustments in food service expenses based on the projected average daily offender
population.
$54,454 in general funds for the costs of Prisoner Compensation within the new Rapid City Correctional Facility.
$986,366 in general funds and 10.0 in FTE for the costs of Education and Programs within the new Rapid City Correctional
Facility.
$1,549,762 in general funds and 16.0 in FTE for the costs of Housing Unit Management within the new Rapid City
Correctional Facility.
$6,732,583 in general funds and 80.0 in FTE for the costs of Security Operations within the new Rapid City Correctional
Facility.
$1,066,008 in general funds and 3.0 in FTE for the costs of the Physical Plant within the new Rapid City Correctional
Facility.
(1826) Inmate Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $45,547,512 $132,372 - $45,679,884 197.9
Medical Contract Expansion and $1,138,840 - - $1,138,840 -
Inflation
Nursing Positions to Contract - - - - (20.0)
Nursing Authority Budget
Transfer
Women's Prison Medical ($2,397,900) - - ($2,397,900) -
Services Reduction
Rapid City Correctional Facility - $4,952,724 - - $4,952,724 22.0
Inmate Medical
Discretionary Provider Inflation $135,778 - - $135,778 -
of 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - - - (10.0)
Appropriation $49,376,954 $132,372 - $49,509,326 189.9
$1,138,840 in general funds for expansion and inflation in the cost of medical services.
(20.0) in FTE for the transfer of authority for nursing positions to authority for contract nursing.
($2,397,900) in general funds for the reduction of medical services at the South Dakota Women's Prison, due to the
decommissioning of the Pierre Minimum Center.
$4,952,724 in general funds and 22.0 in FTE for the cost of Inmate Services to support the medical care of offenders in
the new Rapid City Correctional Facility.
$135,778 in general funds for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 44 1326
(10.0) in FTE for a reduction in unutilized FTE.
(1827) Parole Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $9,092,886 - - $9,092,886 74.0
Payments to County Jails for $275,000 - - $275,000 -
Housing Parolees Increase
Appropriation $9,367,886 - - $9,367,886 74.0
$275,000 in general funds for an increase in payments to counties for housing parolees in jails.
(1831) Juvenile Community Corrections
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $14,729,309 $1,766,879 - $16,496,188 21.7
Federal Medical Assistance $23,844 ($23,844) - - -
Percentage Change
Juvenile Corrections Population ($1,353,631) ($327,882) - ($1,681,513) -
Change
Discretionary Provider Inflation $101,964 $19,668 - $121,632 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $13,501,486 $1,434,821 - $14,936,307 21.7
$23,844 in general funds and ($23,844) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
($1,353,631) in general funds and ($327,882) in federal fund expenditure authority for adjustments in projected juvenile
placements.
$101,964 in general funds and $19,668 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(18) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $157,630,620 $3,316,268 $5,304,138 $166,251,026 974.6
Adjustments $13,537,799 ($332,058) - $13,205,741 93.0
Appropriation $171,168,419 $2,984,210 $5,304,138 $179,456,767 1,067.6
Personal Services $99,972,950 $567,825 $1,692,734 $102,233,509
Operating Expenses $71,195,469 $2,416,385 $3,611,404 $77,223,258
Total $171,168,419 $2,984,210 $5,304,138 $179,456,767 1,067.6
Section 22.
(19) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
(1900) Administration, Secretary of Human Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,892,536 $1,715,879 $3,537 $3,611,952 30.0
Assistant Director to Internal $60,890 $60,890 - $121,780 1.0
Controls Budget Transfer
Appropriation $1,953,426 $1,776,769 $3,537 $3,733,732 31.0
$60,890 in general funds, $60,890 in federal fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for transferring a vacant assistant
director position to create a new internal controls position.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 45 1326
(1910) Developmental Disabilities
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $136,485,631 $154,874,521 $10,085,783 $301,445,935 36.5
Federal Medical Assistance $2,298,900 ($2,476,993) $178,093 - -
Percentage Change
Medicaid and Other Program $10,773,708 $12,640,063 $1,639,839 $25,053,610 -
Utilization
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($750,000) ($750,000) -
Discretionary Provider Inflation $1,912,629 $2,058,492 $143,694 $4,114,815 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $151,470,868 $167,096,083 $11,297,409 $329,864,360 36.5
$2,298,900 in general funds, ($2,476,993) in federal fund expenditure authority and $178,093 in other fund expenditure
authority for a change in the federal medical assistance percentage.
$10,773,708 in general funds, $12,640,063 in federal fund expenditure authority and $1,639,839 in other fund
expenditure authority for increased Medicaid and other agency program utilization.
($750,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
$1,912,629 in general funds, $2,058,492 in federal fund expenditure authority and $143,694 in other fund expenditure
authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(1911) South Dakota Developmental Center - Redfield
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $13,216,546 $13,760,086 $857,224 $27,833,856 259.1
Federal Medical Assistance $227,765 ($227,765) - - -
Percentage Change
Utility Cost Adjustment $8,184 $8,408 - $16,592 -
Appropriation $13,452,495 $13,540,729 $857,224 $27,850,448 259.1
$227,765 in general funds and ($227,765) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$8,184 in general funds and $8,408 in federal fund expenditure authority for adjustments in utility expenses.
(1920) Long Term Services and Supports
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $162,903,835 $198,595,072 $982,568 $362,481,475 101.0
Homemaker Fees Fund Swap ($284,467) - $284,467 - -
Federal Medical Assistance $2,613,881 ($2,613,881) - - -
Percentage Change
Medicaid and Other Program $5,113,439 $5,030,438 $115,749 $10,259,626 -
Utilization
Title III Meal Programs $476,186 $935,937 - $1,412,123 -
Discretionary Provider Inflation $2,649,877 $2,754,703 - $5,404,580 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $173,472,751 $204,702,269 $1,382,784 $379,557,804 101.0
($284,467) in general funds and $284,467 in other fund expenditure authority for using collected homemaker fees.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 46 1326
$2,613,881 in general funds and ($2,613,881) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$5,113,439 in general funds, $5,030,438 in federal fund expenditure authority and $115,749 in other fund expenditure
authority for increased Medicaid and other agency program utilization.
$476,186 in general funds and $935,937 in federal fund expenditure authority for the increased costs of Title III meal
programs.
$2,649,877 in general funds and $2,754,703 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of
1.4%.
(1950) Rehabilitation Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $7,049,678 $22,603,709 $2,446,235 $32,099,622 102.1
Disability Determination Service - $480,000 - $480,000 -
Federal Medical Assistance $64,747 ($64,747) - - -
Percentage Change
Discretionary Provider Inflation $94,232 $108,359 $5,772 $208,363 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $7,208,657 $23,127,321 $2,452,007 $32,787,985 102.1
$480,000 in federal fund expenditure authority for changes in the workload of the in-state Disability Determination
Service.
$64,747 in general funds and ($64,747) in federal fund expenditure authority for a change in the federal medical
assistance percentage.
$94,232 in general funds, $108,359 in federal fund expenditure authority and $5,772 in other fund expenditure authority
for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(1951) Telecommunication Devices for the Deaf
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $1,301,680 $1,301,680 -
Appropriation - - $1,301,680 $1,301,680 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Telecommunication Devices for the Deaf.
(1970) Service to the Blind and Visually Impaired
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,202,590 $3,211,994 $555,410 $4,969,994 29.2
Assistant Director to Internal ($60,890) ($60,890) - ($121,780) (1.0)
Controls Budget Transfer
Discretionary Provider Inflation $4,969 $4,378 - $9,347 -
of 1.4%
Appropriation $1,146,669 $3,155,482 $555,410 $4,857,561 28.2
($60,890) in general funds, ($60,890) in federal fund expenditure authority and (1.0) in FTE for transferring a vacant
assistant director position to create a new internal controls position.
$4,969 in general funds and $4,378 in federal fund expenditure authority for discretionary provider inflation of 1.4%.
(19) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 47 1326
Base $322,750,816 $394,761,261 $16,232,437 $733,744,514 557.9
Adjustments $25,954,050 $18,637,392 $1,617,614 $46,209,056 -
Appropriation $348,704,866 $413,398,653 $17,850,051 $779,953,570 557.9
Personal Services $19,275,588 $28,973,831 $302,873 $48,552,292
Operating Expenses $329,429,278 $384,424,822 $17,547,178 $731,401,278
Total $348,704,866 $413,398,653 $17,850,051 $779,953,570 557.9
Section 23.
(25) SOUTH DAKOTA RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(2501) South Dakota Retirement System
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $6,537,548 $6,537,548 35.0
Appropriation - - $6,537,548 $6,537,548 35.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit South Dakota Retirement System.
(25) SOUTH DAKOTA RETIREMENT SYSTEM TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $6,537,548 $6,537,548 35.0
Adjustments - - - - -
Appropriation - - $6,537,548 $6,537,548 35.0
Personal Services $0 $0 $3,935,374 $3,935,374
Operating Expenses $0 $0 $2,602,174 $2,602,174
Total $0 $0 $6,537,548 $6,537,548 35.0
Section 24.
(26) PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
(2610) Public Utilities Commission (PUC)
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $763,394 $421,672 $4,212,461 $5,397,527 31.2
Consumer Affairs $185,440 - ($185,440) - -
Representatives Fund Swap
Consumer Affairs Manager Fund $128,720 - ($128,720) - -
Swap
Commissioners Fund Swap $109,875 - ($109,875) - -
Regional Transmission $170,232 - ($170,232) - -
Organization Analyst Budget
Transfer
Staff Analysts Budget Transfer $64,151 - ($64,151) - -
Appropriation $1,421,812 $421,672 $3,554,043 $5,397,527 31.2
$185,440 in general funds and ($185,440) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the budget of consumer
affairs representative positions.
$128,720 in general funds and ($128,720) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the budget of a consumer
affairs manager position.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 48 1326
$109,875 in general funds and ($109,875) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the budgets of three
commissioners.
$170,232 in general funds and ($170,232) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the budget for a regional
transmission organization analyst.
$64,151 in general funds and ($64,151) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the budget for staff analysts
for regional transmission organization work.
(26) PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $763,394 $421,672 $4,212,461 $5,397,527 31.2
Adjustments $658,418 - ($658,418) - -
Appropriation $1,421,812 $421,672 $3,554,043 $5,397,527 31.2
Personal Services $1,235,893 $339,117 $2,627,152 $4,202,162
Operating Expenses $185,919 $82,555 $926,891 $1,195,365
Total $1,421,812 $421,672 $3,554,043 $5,397,527 31.2
Section 25.
(27) UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM
(2701) State Bar Association - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $640,253 $640,253 3.0
Appropriation - - $640,253 $640,253 3.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit State Bar Association - Informational.
(271) Unified Judicial System
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $65,447,413 $346,249 $14,600,518 $80,394,180 608.7
Court Services Secretary - 2nd $59,658 - - $59,658 1.0
Circuit
Drug and DUI Court Utilization ($159,396) - - ($159,396) -
Alternative Care Grant Program $365,000 - - $365,000 -
Discretionary Provider Inflation $51,119 - - $51,119 -
at 1.4%
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($200,000) ($200,000) -
Appropriation $65,763,794 $346,249 $14,400,518 $80,510,561 609.7
($159,396) in general funds for decreased treatment costs of drug and DUI court participants.
$365,000 in general funds for the potential cost of new participants in the alternative care program.
$51,119 in general funds for discretionary provider inflation at 1.4%.
($200,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(272) Equal Access to Our Courts
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $300,000 - $200,000 $500,000 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 49 1326
Appropriation $300,000 - $200,000 $500,000 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Equal Access to Our Courts.
(273) Indigent Legal Services
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,454,402 - - $1,454,402 7.0
Appropriation $1,454,402 - - $1,454,402 7.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Indigent Legal Services.
(27) UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $67,201,815 $346,249 $15,440,771 $82,988,835 618.7
Adjustments $316,381 - ($200,000) $116,381 1.0
Appropriation $67,518,196 $346,249 $15,240,771 $83,105,216 619.7
Personal Services $59,430,516 $75,952 $4,230,071 $63,736,539
Operating Expenses $8,087,680 $270,297 $11,010,700 $19,368,677
Total $67,518,196 $346,249 $15,240,771 $83,105,216 619.7
Section 26.
(28) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH
(2810) Legislative Operations
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $9,531,882 - - $9,531,882 38.6
Assistant Code Counsel $150,000 - - $150,000 1.0
Legislative Editor $150,000 - - $150,000 1.0
Shirts for Pages $4,000 - - $4,000 -
Analyst/Attorney $150,000 - - $150,000 1.0
Appropriation $9,985,882 - - $9,985,882 41.6
$150,000 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for a new assistant code counsel position.
$150,000 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for a new legislative editor position.
$4,000 in general funds for legislative page shirts.
$150,000 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for a new analyst/attorney position.
(2815) Legislative Priority Fund
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $755,066 $755,066 -
Appropriation - - $755,066 $755,066 -
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Legislative Priority Fund.
(2880) Auditor General
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 50 1326
Base $5,977,525 - - $5,977,525 43.0
Appropriation $5,977,525 - - $5,977,525 43.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Auditor General.
(28) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $15,509,407 - $755,066 $16,264,473 81.6
Adjustments $454,000 - - $454,000 3.0
Appropriation $15,963,407 - $755,066 $16,718,473 84.6
Personal Services $5,428,122 $0 $0 $5,428,122
Operating Expenses $549,403 $0 $0 $549,403
Single Line Item Appropriation $9,985,882 $0 $755,066 $10,740,948
Total $15,963,407 $0 $755,066 $16,718,473 84.6
Section 27.
(29) OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
(2900) Legal Services Program
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $7,790,770 $1,028,903 $4,318,986 $13,138,659 77.0
Legal Assistant in Rapid City $99,370 - - $99,370 1.0
Medicaid Fraud, Abuse, and - $239,682 ($239,682) - -
Neglect Services Fund Swap
Consumer Protection Special - - $91,009 $91,009 1.0
Projects Coordinator
Appropriation $7,890,140 $1,268,585 $4,170,313 $13,329,038 79.0
$99,370 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for a new legal assistant position in the Rapid City office.
$239,682 in federal fund expenditure authority and ($239,682) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the
budget of the Medicaid Fraud, Abuse, and Neglect Services Division.
$91,009 in other fund expenditure authority and 1.0 in FTE for a new special projects coordinator position in the Consumer
Protection Division.
(2911) Criminal Investigation
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $12,315,436 $4,675,983 $7,562,180 $24,553,599 121.5
Cooperative Disability - $514,832 ($514,832) - -
Investigations Fund Swap
Unutilized FTE and Authority - - ($85,000) ($85,000) -
Appropriation $12,315,436 $5,190,815 $6,962,348 $24,468,599 121.5
$514,832 in federal fund expenditure authority and ($514,832) in other fund expenditure authority for realigning the
budget of the Cooperative Disability Investigations program.
($85,000) in other fund expenditure authority for a reduction in unutilized authority.
(2912) Law Enforcement Training
General Federal Other Total FTE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 51 1326
Base $317,806 - $3,031,262 $3,349,068 14.5
Appropriation $317,806 - $3,031,262 $3,349,068 14.5
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Law Enforcement Training.
(2913) 911 Training
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $279,141 $279,141 2.0
Appropriation - - $279,141 $279,141 2.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit 911 Training.
(2915) Insurance Fraud Unit - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $347,848 $347,848 3.0
Appropriation - - $347,848 $347,848 3.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Insurance Fraud Unit - Informational.
(29) OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $20,424,012 $5,704,886 $15,539,417 $41,668,315 218.0
Adjustments $99,370 $754,514 ($748,505) $105,379 2.0
Appropriation $20,523,382 $6,459,400 $14,790,912 $41,773,694 220.0
Personal Services $15,424,940 $2,441,355 $7,640,731 $25,507,026
Operating Expenses $5,098,442 $4,018,045 $7,150,181 $16,266,668
Total $20,523,382 $6,459,400 $14,790,912 $41,773,694 220.0
Section 28.
(30) SCHOOL AND PUBLIC LANDS
(3001) Administration of School and Public Lands
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $903,717 - $342,052 $1,245,769 7.0
Printer/Scanner $3,500 - - $3,500 -
Appropriation $907,217 - $342,052 $1,249,269 7.0
$3,500 in general funds for a printer/scanner.
(30) SCHOOL AND PUBLIC LANDS TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $903,717 - $342,052 $1,245,769 7.0
Adjustments $3,500 - - $3,500 -
Appropriation $907,217 - $342,052 $1,249,269 7.0
Personal Services $711,101 $0 $65,837 $776,938
Operating Expenses $196,116 $0 $276,215 $472,331
Total $907,217 $0 $342,052 $1,249,269 7.0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 52 1326
Section 29.
(31) SECRETARY OF STATE
(3101) Secretary of State
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,596,365 $2,013,974 $1,118,294 $4,728,633 17.6
Release of Help America Vote - $262,169 - $262,169 -
Act Funding
Appropriation $1,596,365 $2,276,143 $1,118,294 $4,990,802 17.6
$262,169 in federal fund expenditure authority for the release of Help America Vote Act funding to counties.
(31) SECRETARY OF STATE TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,596,365 $2,013,974 $1,118,294 $4,728,633 17.6
Adjustments - $262,169 - $262,169 -
Appropriation $1,596,365 $2,276,143 $1,118,294 $4,990,802 17.6
Personal Services $1,013,267 $141,577 $553,884 $1,708,728
Operating Expenses $583,098 $2,134,566 $564,410 $3,282,074
Total $1,596,365 $2,276,143 $1,118,294 $4,990,802 17.6
Section 30.
(32) STATE TREASURER
(3201) Treasury Management
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $764,651 - - $764,651 5.1
Appropriation $764,651 - - $764,651 5.1
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit Treasury Management.
(3202) Unclaimed Property - Informational
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $37,525,105 $37,525,105 -
Unclaimed Property Payments - - $20,000,000 $20,000,000 -
Verification and Fraud Detection - - $75,000 $75,000 -
Services Budget Transfer and
Increase
Appropriation - - $57,600,105 $57,600,105 -
$20,000,000 in other fund expenditure authority for payments of unclaimed property.
$75,000 in other fund expenditure authority for realigning and increasing the budget for enterprise administration system
verification and fraud detection services.
(3203) Unclaimed Property Operations
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,397,731 - - $1,397,731 5.9
Claims Analyst/Specialist $174,009 - - $174,009 2.0
Database Management Fee $11,790 - - $11,790 -
Full-Service Brokerage Contract $110,000 - - $110,000 -
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 53 1326
Verification and Fraud Detection ($33,025) - - ($33,025) -
Services Budget Transfer and
Increase
Administrative Clerk $80,638 - - $80,638 1.0
Appropriation $1,741,143 - - $1,741,143 8.9
$174,009 in general funds and 2.0 in FTE for new claims analysts/specialists positions.
$11,790 in general funds for an existing enterprise administration system database management fee.
$110,000 in general funds for a new full-service brokerage contract through the unclaimed property enterprise
administration system.
($33,025) in general funds for realigning and increasing the budget for enterprise administration system verification and
fraud detection services.
$80,638 in general funds and 1.0 in FTE for a new administrative clerk position.
(3210) Investment of State Funds
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $13,047,025 $13,047,025 35.0
Bank Custodian Contract - - $6,280 $6,280 -
Inflation
Office Rent Inflation - - $7,588 $7,588 -
Employee Salaries and - - ($184,292) ($184,292) -
Promotional Increases
Investment and Research - - $68,746 $68,746 -
Services Adjustments
State Risk Pool Insurance - - $215 $215 -
Premium Inflation
Office Furniture - - ($1,020) ($1,020) -
Artificial Intelligence Assistant - - $12,600 $12,600 -
Subscriptions
Employee Education Books - - $570 $570 -
Computer Hardware Inflation - - $450 $450 -
State Audit Services - - $2,244 $2,244 -
SDLearn Services - - $1,370 $1,370 -
Appropriation - - $12,961,776 $12,961,776 35.0
$6,280 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of a bank custodian contract.
$7,588 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of office rent.
($184,292) in other fund expenditure authority for new employee salaries and promotions.
$68,746 in other fund expenditure authority for adjustments to existing investment and research services.
$215 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of insurance premiums.
($1,020) in other fund expenditure authority for a decrease in the office furniture budget.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 54 1326
$12,600 in other fund expenditure authority for new enterprise generative artificial intelligence assistant subscriptions.
$570 in other fund expenditure authority for new Chartered Financial Analyst education books for employees.
$450 in other fund expenditure authority for the increased cost of computer hardware purchases.
$2,244 in other fund expenditure authority for an increase in state audit services.
$1,370 in other fund expenditure authority for adding SDLearn through the Bureau of Human Resources and
Administration for employees.
(3211) Performance Based Compensation
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base - - $17,256,902 $17,256,902 -
Performance Based - - ($109,238) ($109,238) -
Compensation
Appropriation - - $17,147,664 $17,147,664 -
($109,238) in other fund expenditure authority for performance-based compensation.
(32) STATE TREASURER TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,162,382 - $67,829,032 $69,991,414 46.0
Adjustments $343,412 - $19,880,513 $20,223,925 3.0
Appropriation $2,505,794 - $87,709,545 $90,215,339 49.0
Personal Services $1,366,323 $0 $26,838,970 $28,205,293
Operating Expenses $1,139,471 $0 $60,870,575 $62,010,046
Total $2,505,794 $0 $87,709,545 $90,215,339 49.0
Section 31.
(33) STATE AUDITOR
(3300) State Auditor
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,937,695 - - $1,937,695 17.0
Appropriation $1,937,695 - - $1,937,695 17.0
There are no changes in appropriations for budget unit State Auditor.
(33) STATE AUDITOR TOTALS
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $1,937,695 - - $1,937,695 17.0
Adjustments - - - - -
Appropriation $1,937,695 - - $1,937,695 17.0
Personal Services $1,715,555 $0 $0 $1,715,555
Operating Expenses $222,140 $0 $0 $222,140
Total $1,937,695 $0 $0 $1,937,695 17.0
Section 32.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 55 1326
STATE
General Federal Other Total FTE
Base $2,462,985,115 $3,124,833,995 $1,735,823,858 $7,323,642,968 14,095.3
Adjustments $80,631,925 ($24,159,107) $91,982,530 $148,455,348 26.0
Appropriation $2,543,617,040 $3,100,674,888 $1,827,806,388 $7,472,098,316 14,121.3
Personal Services $622,570,919 $252,330,207 $633,887,396 $1,508,788,522
Operating Expenses $1,911,060,239 $2,848,344,681 $1,193,163,926 $5,952,568,846
Single Line Item Appropriation $9,985,882 $0 $755,066 $10,740,948
Total $2,543,617,040 $3,100,674,888 $1,827,806,388 $7,472,098,316 14,121.3
Section 33. The state treasurer shall transfer moneys from the following funds, to the general fund,
for the purposes and amounts indicated:
From the state highway fund:
Radio Communications Operations $4,855,686
Governor's Office Operations $118,958
From the game, fish and parks fund:
Radio Communications Operations $84,768
From the game, fish and parks administrative revolving fund:
Governor's Office Operations $20,029
From the motor vehicle fund:
Radio Communications Operations $759,434
Section 34. The state treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the state veterans home operating
fund created by § 33A-4-24 to the general fund.
Section 35. The state treasurer shall transfer the amount identified by notice of the state investment
officer pursuant to S.D. Const., Art. XIII, § 21, for the Department of Education - state aid to
education from the dakota cement trust fund to the general fund.
Section 36. The state treasurer shall transfer the amount identified by notice of the state investment
officer pursuant to § 4-5-29.1, for the Department of Social Services - medical services from the
health care trust fund to the general fund.
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 56 1326
Section 37. The state treasurer shall transfer the amount identified by notice of the state investment
officer pursuant to § 4-5-29.2, for the Department of Education - state aid to education and the
Board of Regents - postsecondary scholarship grant programs from the education enhancement trust
fund to the general fund.
Section 38. All members of state boards, councils, commissions, and advisory bodies listed in this
section, or created by law during the One Hundred First and One Hundred Second Legislative
Sessions, are entitled to reimbursement for allowable expenses as approved by the Board of Finance
under the provisions of chapter 3-9. The salary or per diem compensation for members of state
boards, councils, commissions, and advisory bodies for their work in the actual performance of their
duties or responsibilities is as follows:
PER DIEM PAYABLE
FISCAL YEARS 2027 & 2028
BOARDS, COMMITTEES, COUNCILS, AND COMMISSIONS
EXECUTIVE MANAGEMENT
Capitol Complex Restoration and Beautification Commission $ 0
Civil Service Commission $166
Economic Advisors, Council of $ 0
Economic Development, Board of $166
Economic Development Finance Authority $ 0
Educational Enhancement Funding Corporation $ 0
Education Telecommunications, Board of Directors for $166
Housing Development Authority $166
Internal Control, Board of $ 0
Records Retention, State Board of $ 0
Research and Commercialization Council $ 0
Science and Technology Authority, Board of $166
SD Building Authority $166
SD Ellsworth Authority $ 0
SD Health and Educational Facilities Authority $ 0
Public Safety Communications Council $ 0
REVENUE
Gaming, Commission on $166
SD Lottery Commission $166
AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL RESOURCES
American Dairy Association of SD $166
Animal Industry Board $166
Brand Board $166
Corn Utilization Council $166
Oilseeds Council $166
SD Pulse Crops Council $166
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 57 1326
Soybean Research and Promotion Council $166
State Conservation Commission $166
State Fair Commission $166
Veterinary Medical Examiners, Board of $166
Weed and Pest Control Commission $166
Wheat Commission $166
Nutrient Research and Education Council $ 0
Seed Certification Board $ 0
Emergency Response Commission $ 0
Minerals and Environment, Board of $166
Operator Certification Board $ 0
Small Business Clean Air Compliance Advisory Panel $ 0
Water and Natural Resources, Board of $166
Water Management Board $166
TOURISM
Arts Council $166
Tourism, Board of $166
GAME, FISH, AND PARKS
Boundary Waters Commission - SD - MN $ 0
Game, Fish, and Parks Commission $166
Governor's Commission on Ft. Sisseton $ 0
SD Recreation Trail Advisory Board $ 0
SD Snowmobile Advisory Council $ 0
TRIBAL RELATIONS
Indian Education Advisory Council $ 0
SD Geographic Names, Board of $ 0
SOCIAL SERVICES
Addiction and Prevention Professionals, Board of $166
Behavioral Health Advisory Council $ 0
Child Support Commission $ 0
Counselors and Marriage and Family Therapists Examiners, Board of $166
Indian Child Welfare Advisory Council $ 0
Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee $166
Medical Advisory Committee $ 0
Psychologists Examiners, Board of $166
Social Services, Board of $ 0
Social Workers Examiners, Board of $166
HEALTH
Certified Professional Midwives, Board of $166
Chiropractic Examiners, Board of $166
Dentistry, Board of $166
Funeral Services, State Board of $166
Healthcare Associated Infection/Antimicrobial Stewardship Advisory
Committee $ 0
Health Link Advisory Committee $ 0
Hearing Aid Dispensers, Board of $166
HIV Prevention Planning Workgroup $ 0
Massage Therapy, Board of $166
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 58 1326
Medical and Osteopathic Examiners, Board of $166
Nursing, Board of $166
Nursing Home Administrators, Board of $166
Optometry Examiners, Board of $166
Pharmacy, Board of $166
Physical Therapy, Board of $166
Preventive Health and Human Services Block Grant Advisory
Committee $ 0
Podiatry Examiners, Board of $166
Prescription Opioid Abuse Advisory Committee $ 0
Ryan White Care Council $ 0
Speech Language Pathology, Board of $166
Tobacco Prevention and Control State Advisory Committee $ 0
LABOR AND REGULATION
Abstractors Board of Examiners $166
Accountancy, SD Board of $166
Appraiser Certification Program Advisory Council $166
Banking Commission, State $166
Barber Examiners, Board of $166
Cosmetology Commission $166
Electrical Commission, State $166
Governor's Task Force on Trust Administration Review and Reform $ 0
Human Rights, Commission on $166
Plumbing Commission $166
Public Deposit Protection Commission $ 0
Real Estate Commission $166
Reemployment Assistance Advisory Council $166
SD Athletic Commission $166
SD Workforce Development Council $166
State Apprenticeship Council $166
State Workers' Compensation Advisory Council $ 0
Technical Professions, Board of $166
TRANSPORTATION
Aeronautics Commission $166
Railroad Board, SD $166
Transportation Commission, State $166
EDUCATION
Advisory Panel for Children with Disabilities $ 0
America 250th South Dakota Commission $166
Education Standards, State Board of $166
Extraordinary Cost Oversight Board $ 0
Historical Society Trustees, Board of $166
Practitioners, Committee of $ 0
Professional Administrators Practices and Standards Commission $166
Professional Practices and Standards Commission $166
Richard Hagen-Minerva Harvey Memorial Scholarship Board $ 0
School Finance Accountability Board $166
SD Interagency Coordinating Council $ 0
Teacher Compensation Review Board $166
Title III Coordinators Advisory Panel $ 0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 59 1326
Technical Education, Board of $166
Virtual High School Advisory $ 0
PUBLIC SAFETY
Crime Victims Compensation Board $ 0
Fire Marshal's Advisory Board $ 0
One Call Notification Board $ 0
SD Homeland Security Senior Advisory Committee $ 0
SD 9-1-1 Coordination Board $ 0
REGENTS
Regents, Board of $166
CORRECTIONS
Corrections Commission $ 0
Council of Juvenile Services $ 0
Interstate Adult Supervision, State Council for $ 0
Interstate Commission for Juveniles, Council for the $ 0
Pardons and Paroles, Board of $200
The expense reimbursement for each member of the Board of Pardons and Paroles is equal
to the daily rate set in § 24-13-5.
HUMAN SERVICES
Aging, Advisory Council on $166
Blind Vendors Committee $ 0
Family Support Council $ 0
Council on Developmental Disabilities $166
Services to the Blind and Visually Impaired, Board of $166
Statewide Independent Living Council $ 0
Vocational Rehabilitation, Board of $166
SD RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SD Retirement System Board of Trustees $166
UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM
Court Appointed Special Advocate Commission $ 0
Equal Access to Our Courts, Commission on $ 0
Indigent Legal Services Task Force $ 0
Judicial Qualifications Commission $166
Juvenile Justice Oversight Committee $ 0
LEGISLATIVE
The salary or per diem compensation for members of the Legislature is equal to the daily rate
set by subdivision 2-4-2(2).
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Government Accountability Board
The salary or per diem compensation for members of the Government Accountability Board
is set by § 3-24-1.
Law Enforcement Officers Standards Commission $166
Open Meeting Commission $166
SECRETARY OF STATE
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 60 1326
Elections, State Board of $166
Finance, Board of $ 0
Help America Vote Act Board $ 0
STATE TREASURER
Investment Council $166
Public Deposit Protection Commission $ 0
HB1326 ENROLLED

26.1062.14 61 1326
An Act to appropriate money for the ordinary expenses of the legislative, judicial, and executive
departments of the state, the current expenses of state institutions, interest on the public debt, and
common schools.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1326
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1326 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1326 ENROLLED